Colossians 2:8 warns believers of this risk: “See to it that no one takes you captive through hollow and deceptive philosophy, which depends on human tradition and the basic principles of this world rather than on Christ.”
4. GO TO CLASS — Seriously, if you’re gonna spend your (or your parents’) money to go to college, then FREAKING GO. I’m so tired of hearing the same questions asked because people didn’t go to class and do exercises or get due dates. WORK IS GOOD FOR YOU!!!
While they are decorated in a festive manner, the new art installations are meant to bring awareness to the animals at the Louisiana SPCA.
In addition, these high-end brands have also added a fragrance to the powder.
I haven't been thinking of myself as an 'artist,' lately. Having fought so long and so hard to be one, I have realized that the fight was killing me, and decided to stop. Lately I have been taking one day at a time, and focussing literally on whether the floor is clean, and what the light is like, and--god help us--politics. And, if I am to be truly confessional, trying to figure out what to do with the voice that has been growing increasingly hard to ignore, over the last six months or so, the one that's making that keening sound, having to do with, horrors! nesting, and loneliness, and biological clocks.
Freddy: It was wrong of you to lock me up. I had to hurt myself to get out. And I know you're in here, because I can smell your brains.
There are also other credit cards out there that give you points when you use them to purchase things. One of the main ones I use is my Chase Freedom card. I get 1% back for every purchase I made at the store. But because I also have a Chase bank account, I get an additional 10% on top of that 1% (1.10% total) and 10 points for each purchase. On top of that, every 3 months there are categories in which you can use your card on and you’ll get 5% instead. For example, for January through March, they could have gas stations and movie theaters as their categories. Each time you use your card in those places, you’d get 5% cash back instead of the usual 1% (up to $1500, after which will go back down to 1%). The one downside is that you have to sign up for the 5% categories every time they switch (so every 3 months, but it’s free). When redeeming points, you typically get $1 for every 1000 points. So $10 dollars for every 10000 points, which may seem like very little but it does add up after a few months.
In June 1923 a gig in Atlantic City, New Jersey, led to a play date at the prestigious Exclusive Club in Harlem. This was followed in September 1923 by a move to the Hollywood Club – 49th and Broadway – and a four-year engagement, which gave Ellington a solid artistic base. He was known to play the bugle at the end of each performance. The group was called Elmer Snowden and his Black Sox Orchestra and had seven members, including James “Bubber” Miley. They renamed themselves “The Washingtonians”. Snowden left the group in early 1924 and Ellington took over as bandleader. After a fire the club was re-opened as the Club Kentucky (often referred to as the “Kentucky Club”), an engagement which set the stage for the biggest opportunities in Ellington’s life.
He promptly jumped out of bed and said "Are you pregnant??" I just nodded my head and he grabbed my hands and started jumping up and down. Those of you who know Dan.... this is the hugest reaction ever. Then, he stopped and looked at me and said "You're pregnant!!!"
At midday, O king, I saw in the way a light from heaven, above the brightness of the sun, shining round about me and them which journeyed with me. And when we were all fallen to the earth, I heard a voice speaking unto me, and saying in the Hebrew tongue, Saul, Saul, why persecutest thou me? it is hard for thee to kick against the pricks. And I said, Who art thou, Lord? And he said, I am Jesus whom thou persecutest.
A good movie in the background. Overboard with Goldie Hawn will do just fine.
the snow will fall
a very impressive collection of beautiful home decor
The legend of the whoopie pie: Some people say it originated when Amish farmers in Pennsylvania shouted with delight upon finding this treat in their lunch. Others contest it started in Maine, where it is the official state treat (not dessert, TREAT).
Much like Pink Floyd's The Dark Side of The Moon syncs up perfectly with The Wizard of Oz, The Midnight Organ Fight syncs up perfectly with the past two years of my own life. It sweetly, boldly tells the tale. I listen and fragments of my damaged life (more black and blue than black and white) present themselves boldly etched in my mind like Edward Gorey is working feverishly away in my noggin. I listen as I lose bits of myself and bits of my children like a leper loses limbs...while I need good arms to fit perfectly or twist around my waist to bring heat around my cold, aching body. I hold my breath while I struggle to swim through deep, drunken, panic-stricken waves. I am on the brink of sincere sorrow, needing to speak of things that can kill, or possibly salvage, an important relationship.
The sole independent candidate is likely to receive fewer than 100 votes, but the UKIP candidate in the Bixley County Council election is likely to get several hundred votes, maybe taking fourth or even third place.
SERVES –6
There are currently, according to the 2010 US census, one in seven people living in poverty in the United States of America. When one considers how low the bar is set for determining poverty, $21, 954 for a family of four, I believe it is fair to say there are more than that living a subsistent life.
It is this absurd compulsion to reduce all the complexities of humanity to ‘choices’ that prevents the conversation from going forward. It took quite some time in the position of COO before Sandberg felt safe enough to make her confession. A woman in men’s clothing confessing that she is still a woman.
Suggestions for action?
Sheriff Reichaert has participated in this program for several years but was unable to last year due to heart surgery. He will again provide rides with Dave Hahn of the Wood County Tavern League. Hahn and Reichert will pick up individuals, as well as take their vehicles home, to help provide safe roads and avoid possible operatong while intoxicated situations.
“It was her favorite book and the only gift she ever accepted from me. She left it here.” It struck a nerve that she’d left behind what he considered a treasured keepsake. After all, he had given it to her. It was beyond his belief that she’d have left it behind by choice.
And never in the shade
16. The virtue of patience.
PescaroloTeam have signaled their desire to compete in both the 2011 Le Mans Series, and 24 Hours of Le Mans. Although opting against participating in the ACO’s new Intercontinental Le Mans Cup series in favour of a gradual and stable rebirth, Pescarolo has stated his intent to take part in future iterations of the ILMC.
International Court of Women against Neo-liberal policies
As is often the case with new friends abroad, offers to visit, and places to stay if ever you were in the area were passed around and after Nik and Ingrid found out I was heading to New York they started listing all the places that they had to take me to and I’m looking forward to seeing them again.
A charitable reading of Rosen’s comments mostly exonerates her of intentional malice, but the left never cuts such slack to the hated rightwingers, so what’s good for the goose is good for the gander. The Romney campaign has stuffed the Obama-bots twice in the past two weeks, and the main event hasn’t even kicked off yet.
It was very bumpy! I've never driven over such deep, rutted, corrugated gravel road before. I reminded HB that all the information we had read stipulated 30km on all inland roads so he slowed down a little bit. However, a little way down the road was a 50km sign so he revved it up and we bounced and ricocheted our way along the inland track from Hook Point nearly all the way to Eurong.
About ten years after her I was doing the same in my Secondary School Library, while bunking off games. Balder was speaking to both of us and the bleak beauty of the downfall of the gods.
Yes, both are fine. I love seeing all the creative things you make and sell. In fact, please keep making them. There is no need to credit my name on your handmade finished item.
I am including this preface to inform the reader of any and all circumstances that might be conceived of a creating a biased review or a conflict of interest regarding the choice of words used in the following review. I could go on and on with semi-legal jargon but I guess you will just have to trust me eh?
1/4 tsp haldi
All good signs of spring, but I hope there will be something a little less predictable around the corner.
Oh! And one LAST thing...
I can sit with these boys in any bar in town and never does a wandering hand land on my lap. Never does a lewd or crude word arrive at my ears. They’re about as interested in me sexually as Charlie Sheen is interested in another ride in the back seat of a police cruiser. If there’s any sexual energy at our table, it’s only when a good looking boy enters the room. If an attractive lass appears, I’m the only one who notices. Or comments.
1/2 tsp. cinnamon (or more if you like)
4. The designer told me not to press any of the seams on the block until I had it all sewn together as this would minimize stretching along the bias. I tried this, and it really does help.
Kathleen’s book was nothing short of inspirational, and it really motivated me
This has two great advantages, Breham said. First, an independent instruction judge is appointed for the civil case. Second, Suaram becomes a party to the case, at which point the legal team, acting for Suaram, can then have access to all the files about the case and can ask questions of the instruction judge and request that he investigates on its behalf.
She did not not move her eyes from her Prime.
Lewis Schaffer shrugged and nodded towards me.
6.Sweet Brothers / I Got A Bulldog
I now use it on Facebook and other
Successful people don’t necessarily enjoy or like the things they have to do to be successful, but they understand that they HAVE to do them to be successful!
My friend's son turned 3. I went to her house early this morning and helped get everything ready for the party. Transported everything to the park and set up. Some moms I have never met were there. The "do you JUST have one child?" question came up. Yes, just the one. "Oh because I thought you had two?" really lady can you JUST drop it because I don't have just the one, I have two, but I don't know you, and I don't feel like crying at 10am in the morning right before about 40 people show up to this fantastic shit parade that I am trying to be joyous about participating in. Did I happen to mention that I really don't cuss very often in real life, but in blog land, well, it is just how I feel. A bunch of moms club moms and kids show up and I get some people who will talk with me. It is so hard to interact, I feel really distracted, edgy, skittish. Other women avoid me, I'm the lady whose baby died you know, it might be catching. Others just don't know~the new moms that have joined since Camille died. I also feel shitty because I haven't written thank you cards for any food or monetary support we got. I feel guilty about that....Because I am GOOD AT GUILT.
01.Violent Pacification
Emails
I had high hopes that fandom would be the last refuge of the unprogrammable-- a true counterculture-- but as usual my nostalgia got the best of me. The daycare generation that fills the ranks of fandom these days is so efficiently socialized that the weirdness and freedom of 70s fandom exists as nothing but as just another museum piece to be cataloged and double-bagged and put away in a box, never to be seen again.
Fashion is such a fickle thing. I am sure when the Qantas management team commissioned their grey in flight pyjamas from Peter Morrissey, they had no idea they were creating the ultimate teenage lounging item. Overseas guests, who forewarned by email, arrive at the house clutching their complementary pyjamas and hand them over to the resident Drama Queens win immediate brownie points. Fortuitously given any visitor fortunate enough to be flying Business Class tends, surprise, surprise, to be male and on business, the Drama Queens seem to work on the principle of the bigger the better in terms of sizing and slither round the house clad in the outsize grey cotton numbers. (Note to self, have not tried on a pair of the Qantas pyjamas but can safely predict appearance would provide further proof of Rule no.2 above).
Fourth, this time in this weakness has really birthed a passion in me for those who are in my situation. I want to help others understand how to best minister to us and in my strength minister to them.
In the case of Game, within a week of entering administration the appointed administrators from PricewaterhouseCoopers had restructured the company, closed half the shops, made a large number of employees redundant and sold off the balance of the shops to a new investor in a deal agreed with the creditors, mainly banks. Job done in six days.
Ande created and printed these pretty much all by himself. I was there mainly for moral support. I think they turned out AWESOME. Added bonus, the silver ink is actually sparkly. And you all know how much I LOVE stuff that sparkles. HA!
That is until I came across a great big pile of evergreen trimmings at Lowes yesterday. Did you know you can literally fill a trash bag with as many of these clippings as you want in the garden center of your local Lowes this time of year? And fill I did! I didn't really know what I was going to do with them but I figured for the price of $0 I could figure it out when I got home and at the very least my car would smell Christmasy for the ride home.
Famous People with Life Path 3
It's not often that governments are told off for undercharging on taxes. But Germany has been told that it must increase the 7% VAT rate it currently requires on works of art and collectors' items up to 19%. According to the European Commission's press release, member states of the EU are only allowed to charge reduced rate VAT on a specified list of goods and services - upon which works of art do not feature.
Simply speaking: Whenever any citizen invokes cultural law, then this means that the court has to follow choice of law rules. Invoking cultural law, only exists in societies which the law considers multi-cultural. Monocultural societies do not require the need for a right to invoking cultural law, because the entire society has the same legal cultural principles. So 'choice of law' is a legal term for what Justices are required to do when two people come before the court, and they come from different cultures. The Justice is then required to make an impartial enquiry into the two different cultures and to make a ruling as to which culture's laws are going to be applied to the particular case; and more importantly why he is choosing this cultural law body of principles; rather than that cultural law body of principles.
His relevant evidence for present purposes relates to the NotW’s “Dark Side”, and especially dealings with investigators such as Steve Whittamore.
The other day the DB and I had... a discussion.
FACT: Lalla Ward appears as Princess Astra in this story, which led to her being cast as the second incarnation of Romana in the next season.
* ATF deputy director of operations in the West, William McMahon. Promoted to ATF headquarters.
Cook sausage (and beef if using both) and onion in 10 inch skillet over medium heat 6 to 8 minutes, stirring occasionally, until sausage is no longer pink; drain. Stir in tomato sauce, basil and salt.
Sigh, and I haven't finished that quilt yet....took a little break (or maybe it is procrastination), the quilting part is not going to be my favorite thing about doing this project. OH WELL, in the meantime.......
So. Here is where we are. We juice lots of green leafy vegetables for about three days at a time and start the day out with a big glass. Water with lots of lemon. Very little coffee. (This is all the alkaline stuff.) Fewer starches (mostly for him.....I haven't gotten serious about it yet). More bone broth. And a cruciferous vegetable everyday. Got that idea from Martha Stewart Living. I mean, I already knew they were really good for you....but the idea of eating one (or more) everyday? Sounds good to me. Plus we happen to love all those vegetables. Here are some of the recipes we have tried or will be trying soon.
taking some time today to do a little reflection of the highlights for me this year... both on a personal level and with crafting... where do i even begin?!? so much goodness has happened....
11:30 p.m. Don’t sleep, don’t sleep, don’t sleep.
Somebody needs you… Go find them… Activate yourself… You will not succeed in life unless you are connected to people. Success involves people. People who help you to succeed may not always come to you… In fact they rarely do… You must go to them. Successful people are accessible. “You will never possess what you are unwilling to do.” Jesus knew this… He did not set up a throne in the middle of a city and say, “This is the only place that you can reach me.” He went to the marketplace… to the fisherman’s wharf… to the synagogue… to the homes of the people. He went through towns, preaching and healing everywhere (Luke 9:6). He was reachable… Successful people are reachers. Jesus left the comfort of His Father’s house, and walked into the unholy atmosphere of earth and into the lives of hurting people who needed Him. Jesus went where the people were. Have you a dream? It is connected to people… Success begins somewhere… at some moment… with someone.
While I can see why people might want to read "safe", comforting sort of books at night, and read books that take them out of their comfort zone during the day, I don't think I am truly one of those people.
And I got a bit of a surprise. First I came across the preliminary notes for a Christmas story about a small witch who lived in a large cave at Wookey Hole, which is not far from here. That was printed in the local paper last Christmas. Had forgotten about that. The seed for it was planted a very long time ago, when I made up a story for my little niece (who, incidentally, has just got married) about the Witch of Wookey, after we'd been to visit Wookey Hole. Apparently she was terrified by it for ages afterwards. If ONLY I could remember it.... the recent one was a very much milder version.
Mercifully, Pinterest doesn’t seem to have the power to pull me into its web. Yah, I’m on Pinterest, and I “pin,” but I don’t spend a lot of time surveying other people’s boards. Once in a while I cruise for recipes, and I’m finding some useful and interesting resources on Catholic homeschooling boards…but that’s about it.
And was always there to do it
Some people assume no-kill cat shelters are crowded, horrible places; that the cats are crammed together in small cages. Cat’s Cradle is nothing like that. In fact, I only saw one cat in a cage, and that’s because he was sick and in isolation. The shelter has about 8 rooms, and in each room is six to ten cats, who are allowed to run around, play, eat, drink, poop. None of them are confined, unless sick. They have a good home at Cat’s Cradle.
Instead of having seminars over multiple days, this mini Tales had you choose 3 seminars all on the same day. Here's what I went to on Monday March 14th.
colder than last year —
Compared to everything else she's been through, losing her hair hasn't really bothered Peach in the slightest. When she first heard that it would happen, not having any experience or even a passing knowledge about cancer, she got a little upset. But when I explained that her hair would grow back, and that Daddy's hair would never grow back, she laughed and hasn't given it a second thought since.
Yields 12-15 standard size cupcakes
I go and look and find it in his study. He’s very relieved. In a joint effort, we pay for his petrol remotely, using his credit card.
before He rebuilds.
During my degree studies (and research beyond) I have discovered that The Bible has deeper secrets than I ever realized. I discovered professional methods to not only discover where this bedlam is hiding but how to “make it all go away” once we find it. Imagine laying your head on your pillow at night and actually sleeping for the entire night….
Before I proceed with the review of the shop, it’s important to note that they’re on their SOFT OPENING so perhaps after a few weeks, some of my review about the store and service may not be applicable.
Like the office.
For those that don’t know what a selective reduction is, that is where they insert a needle through my wife’s belly into one of the sacs and put in a lethal substance to stop the heartbeat, in essence killing the baby. The thought is that by sacrificing one, you give the other two a better chance to develop and grow.
7. We see Jill working the door, greeting customers at Zarin Fabrics. She tells the camera how much she loves sales, and we believe it. She helps two smartly dressed gay men find window treatments, and all the while I'm thinking "oh God, Jill! Don't blow it! Don't show them that overly fussy shit you put in your own house!" But you know what? She is just fine. They leave happy, and they tell the camera that not only did they love Jill, but she was very knowledgable. I know--they seemed surprised too.
Seek, then, for this is also sooth,
Take in the Now and enjoy it.
Katie knows more about why she was left at the festival them she is saying.
Last night, I visited a restaurant where my friend works as a manager. I don’t name names on my blog so I’ll just call her Beatrice. Yeah, she’ll like that, ha ha. I met her about two years ago at a wedding and we kept bumping into each other at various events.
“She (Nicole) should be more responsible and not treat certain important matters in a frivolous manner…..For example, when I first proposed NSP sending Nicole to contest in the Hougang by-election, she came out to clarify immediately she would not do so. What if NSP decide to send her in the future?”
Despite much Leftist frothing at the mouth over the "extremism" of Bush's moral and religious views, what we note above is in fact a surprisingly libertarian approach to the abortion conundrum. He starts out rooting his opposition to abortion in that great intersection between Protestant/Christian and conservative/libertarian views: Respect for the individual and the rights and liberties of the individual. And precisely because he sees that principle as axiomatic, he does not go on to advocate a dogmatic policy of coercion or total prohibition but rather a policy of seeking voluntary ways of just REDUCING the number of abortions -- very much the sort of policy that I myself have advocated. So Bush was preaching a synthesis that was both classically conservative and yet also very supportive of Christian values -- with their view of all human life as the work and gift of God. It's the sort of synthesis that might have served a clever politician of the Left well in a religious country but it was the "dumb" George Bush who actually put it forward and won much kudos among Christians in doing so.
flies over the skyline, like a masterful throne
If you catch me listening to music this week, here are the top 5 songs I’m going to be listening too!
Beautiful job, Morgann!
I always maintain my arms,
This time I watched some tutorials and took a different approach. I know some techniques have inherent strengths and weaknesses, so I tried to let the oil pastels do what they were good at: blending colors. Not the best medium for control freaks, I'd wager, but this was a nice exercise that will not haunt me. I'll have to include these in my rotation now. :)
The red flower on her breast
I wish I was present in this situation I will beat this bastard to a pulp and have my dogs drill is ass , and I will take is teeth’s with an hammer and dose acid over before put a bullet on him
Multiple tents and stalls dotted the grounds outside the stadium,but not many people were seen going to them.
Took a class at the LQS using texture magic….and I have to show you the fantastic palm tree that I made using texture magic…. please enlarge the photo to get a good look at the texture…..
Fast forward 6 years later - monkey is starting Beavers and I have decided to improve my computer skills by doing a course - meet the Brown Owl of one of the Brownie Packs in the village - the big pack of 48 had divided into 2 - who after she found out what I had done in the past asked if I would be interested in running the other Pack who were just about to loose their Brown Owl.
Up 1st Saddle, down 3rd access. Ran into Scott, Jenny and Walter on the summit (or rather they ran into me as I was sitting up there), so I spent almost a half an hour on top. Was pleasantly surprised to find decent snow conditions on the lightly-traveled descent that made for minimal frustration. All hiking.
Done in a slightly tweaked Old Baskerville font.
My Score: 8/10 It's a long RPG. 30+ hours if you try to get everything. The only thing it really suffers from is all the grinding you'll be doing if you want to be ready for the boss battle. I enjoyed it.
When things are looking hopeless in this plot, one character wishes for a miracle to which Rains replies, "The Germans have outlawed miracles." Fortunately, Hollywood used to be able to produce some miracles of its own and Casablanca was one of the greatest.
It deff NEEDS it; it's got bare walls & it's bothering me!
In this case, fortunately the girl was an old friend of my boyfriend’s, so they were talking quite a lot. They talked about Japanese Manga for a bit. I had also read the manga they were talking about, so I could sometimes interject with sounds such as “Ah!” or perhaps the sudden “Oh yes, yes!”. A few times I would have liked to form more coherent utterances but there was always something stopping me. ‘Don’t say it!!!!!!’. At one point my boyfriend started a conversation with his granddad, and so the second most dreaded part of socialising had begun. Uncomfortable silences. This happens to me a lot. I hate it when my boyfriend goes to the bathroom and leaves me there to supposedly carry on with the socialising. Is he missing the point that I am completely socially inept? Actually, I think 99% of people probably do not understand just how hard it is. I think they assume you’re just doing it on purpose or because you don’t like that person or something. Well trust me, I’m not.
A laundry room face lift is a project I plan to tackle this fall so it's fun to see the directions that different people (designers mind you) have taken the little utility room with an unlimited budget. Then there is me. My budget is that of a shoe string, we have ugly brown carpet that will be staying put, and 80's style veneer cabinetry. All things a little paint and use of basic textiles should be able to help. Still, I've been staring at photos upon photos trying to come up with a plan that will ensure that our laundry room looks almost as good as these.
You can also freeze the dish once completely cooled. Just leave it out at room temperature to thaw and maybe sauté it in a little oil before serving.
2. Don't be an overachiever. I want my house to look great when my husband comes home, but if I try to be an overachieving house wife I usually end up either ignoring my children while I clean or running around doing bits and pieces without actually accomplishing anything! I went through a stage during our transition to real food where I wanted all of our snacks to be fresh, from scratch, homemade by me. That worked once. Find places where you can bend and then BEND. I don't make my own fruit leather. I buy it from Amazon and I feel no guilt about doing so. That goes for most of our other snacks as well!
Here are a couple with a fantastic outfit with bullet bra and gorgeous color. Marlo has a very fine sense of styling and did her own for this shoot.
Level 7: MP Cost: 25, Damage: 218%, Attacks up to 6 enemies 3 times, 7% chance to stun the enemy for 2 seconds.
ps - there'll also be some fashion soundbytes from me on 98fm - info coming soon!
I do remember her listening quite intently as I gave my frank and full opinions of Rupert Abbott. And in the dates and days that have followed, it's become clear why.
That's what this group of coworkers from the Patient Financial Services/Accounting department at Madonna Rehabilitation Hospital in Lincoln, Nebraska did as a team-building exercise.
8. Be proactive in my mental health and overall physical health. What this means to me is reaching out for help before I cannot. Those with mental health issues like depression fall so deep into that pit of despair that we sometimes cannot find the light or reach for that hand to help us out. I want to make it a goal to seek help when I feel I need it and not pass it off or think it will get better on its own. I’ve been there, done that and have had enough experience to know it gets worse, so much worse, before it ever gets better.
Qualification:
But biologically, the treasure of food consumption causes pleasure also. "Pleasure was designed as the unmistakable signal of success for reaching survival and/or reproductive goals." If we don't eat, we are going to starve and if that happens, we won't be surviving, let alone reproducing.
Friends and families by my side
● funky lamp
The minister said observations of people returning to Japan from countries such as Canada, Mexico and the US, where large numbers of infections were reported, would be scaled down because many people in Hyogo and Osaka prefectures are already infected.
Stephena and Anne Ryan
Luke 15:20 “So he got up and went to his father. But while he was still a long way off, his father saw him and was filled with compassion for him; he ran to his son, threw his arms around him and kissed him.”
I do not need to tell anyone here about the importance of this statistic. Males aged 18-30 of course, are those who wage war, and history tells us that even though they may be outnumbered by moderates, the fanatical minority are always the ones who seize power and the fanatical minority are always the ones who initiate war.
We’ll be a recognized authority on our chosen topics
It’s CycloMAYnia and National Bike Month is officially here in the US! With longer, milder days in the northern hemisphere, it’s time to recognize bicycling for the multitude of benefits it provides – improving our health, economy, and environment.
His basic assumption is that politics is about redistribution of a society’s available resources. In an advanced capitalist country, the resources up for redistribution is fairly closely connected to the health of the capitalist economy. This limits the scope for politics — no matter what happens, the capitalist order needs to be preserved because all the political players understand that if capitalism falls, there won’t be much to redistribute. It also means that politics becomes either about taxes/subsidies/regulations, or about ‘cultural issues’ that can serve as a smokescreen for changes to taxes/subsidies/regulations.
Tomorrow and Friday we will be reviewing EVERYTHING we have learned! Then Monday we take the HESI exit exam and in the afternoon we have rehearsal for the Candle lighting ceremony! Next tuesday will be the Candle lighting ceremony and Wednesday will be the college's graduation ceremony! So it's gonna be busy these next couple of days! But I'm super excited about it! My grandma Ester came from Brazil for my graduation, which just made me so happy! I'll definitely be posting pics on both of those events! Until then :)
I'll never touch you
So recently, when i’m listening to a podcast or something where i wanna sit at my computer and listen to, i’ll play a handheld game. My most recent game has been Final Fantasy 5. These are my thoughts on it.
Ok, I’ll leave you with a few recent pictures…
“Michael Noonan has said himself that there is a commitment that European authorities will continue to supply countries that are in programmes with money even when the programme is concluded, providing they fulfil the conditions of that programme. This situation has not changed; the Government would just like us to think that it has in order for this Treaty to be passed.
I am going to need all that energy later this year....this week we made some final plans to take a trip to Disney in the fall with Chad's parents. I am so, so excited! We have been there once with Audrey when she was 2, but not with all the kids. Chloe's eyes are going to pop right out of her little head when she sees Cinderella's castle!!! I can't wait! We have not told the kids yet, but Chad and I have been talking "in code" with each other about it .... apparently Audrey has been doing a little eavesdropping. Last night I found her scribbling furiously into her notebook and this is what she had written (yes, I sneaked a peek while she was sleeping!):
When I was twelve, I read Pride and Prejudice for the first time. My mother, may she rest in peace, was a great reader, and like the character of Marti in Love Comes Softly, Peggie Jeffers was a firm believer that books held great adventures. Because of her model, I have always read voraciously. Therefore, Pride and Prejudice was just the latest in a long line of classic novels in my reading repertoire. Or so I thought at the time. Little did I know that this novel would speak to me of how personal conduct can be seen as a bridge between private moral order and social order.
Helmet.
At 99.99999999999999…99999%, we might as well round up to 100% certainty, but we do not in case of any possible, however extremely unlikely, evidence may pop up to prove us wrong. Saying we know does not mean that we cannot be wrong. I know my computer is a Macbook Pro.
- splash of vanilla
Now that we have that handy guide over and done with, how was the 'book'(let)?
The leap from kissing grandpa to being molested seems like a truism that we’ve just gotten used to parroting. — Lenore
These are the lyrics of a beautiful song composed by the great legend Burt Bacarach.It was also the theme song for the movie Alfie (played by Michael Caine and Jude Law when he made the remake). It had been nominated for Best Actor, Best Supporting Actress, Best Picture, Best Writing and Best Song. Because of its musical arrangement and lyrics, great singers like Dionne Warwick, Barbara Streisand, Cher, Ella Fitzgerald, Sarah Vaughan (where I got my name from, as told by my dad),Whitney Houston to name a few have their own renditions of the song.
Hi everyone! It's been awhile since I posted here due to some unexpected travel, but here's what I've been up to in the crafty Christmas world:
“E” is our little artist. He can read and write and does pretty well academically. He can watch a video and then draw the graphics from that video. This is usually the end credits because he likes letters and numbers. They are all done in bubble letters. His memory of the details is fantastic! He is a great kid with a lot of potential. Love working with this kid!
Twitter Ye Not - The Eiffel Tower
E. Banks loved having her family around. Her children and grandchildren were the highlight of her life. Holidays were a celebration at the Banks’ house. I suppose this is one reason holidays are big at my house. The heart of E's home was the kitchen. My mom and her 3 sisters would all gather in the tiny kitchen to help prepare dinner but the dressing making was reserved for E. (I must insert that my mom is the wind beneath my wings. Another post later.) E. worked very hard at her job in the hospital. She didn’t drive so when we’d go visit, we’d pick her up from work. She’d come out in her little pink jacket. Back in the day, that kind of seemed out of the norm to me because most women her age didn’t work outside the home. I guess in my mind, a grandma was supposed to be sitting in a rocking chair knitting. But she knew what she needed to do to survive and a survivor she was! She was well liked by her coworkers and a friend to many. I still remember her laughter even though her mind and body were stressed with the cares of life. Lord, help me remember to laugh even in hard times. E. Banks was faithful to God and family. She was grateful for her blessings.
“They probably had some sort of tracking device on the scout,” Manny replied. “Jerry went through his radio while we were on the boat and couldn’t find anything out of the ordinary so I don’t think the device was in his radio.”
The defaults on private loans may spread, along with the downturn of the realty market, caused in part by government’s policy to curb unbridled speculation. Feng Guangyuan, an economist, estimates that 80% of funds for the realty development projects in Ordos come from the private sector. With the downturn of housing prices and stagnant housing sales, bosses of realty firms cannot repay their private debts, tying up huge amount of private funds. In September, 2011, Ordos government forbade legal representatives of 17 realty development firms owing over 1 billion yuan of private debt from leaving the city.
I am anxious in airports. This is a simple way to say that when I am in airports, I am the most basic, one-dimensional version of myself. I am an anxious person.
In January 2000, during a trip to Iraq, cradle of Mesopotamian civilisation, Sophie Ristelhueber discovered a huge palm grove that had been smashed and charred. She decided that this was the vision she would bring back from her journey. It is presented here in triptych form.
But instead of doing that, we are sitting inside watching Hoarders and Pawn Stars.
HIT....
Currently chowing down on blueberries...
We’ve been seeing a lot of ego-centered attitudes flying around Washington with the deficit mess, the frustrating GOP presidential wannabes and in London with the unbelievable Murdoch fiasco. Seems like the more power one has, the more the ego dominates: Me and my opinions are more important than the needs of others. There is no limit to the damage a powerful ego can cause, from the arrogant conviction that our own opinions are only right ones and everyone should be made to agree, to wielding and abusing responsibility and authority at the expense of other people’s lives and freedoms.
After our drive from Chicken, Alaska we spent the night at the Yukon Government Campground next to the Dawson Ferry. This is a very nice campground, although without hookups, along the Yukon River.
The answer is simple: They Aren't.
I hear from above O pennant of war your ironical call and demand,
Bring this analogy back to humans, and if there is something wrong with the body, it needs to be physically fixed – you can’t talk a broken leg into healing itself.
Mary M, Knightdale, NC:
1 1/2 cups chopped walnuts
I’m not about to rush off and settle down with Mr Wrong (settle being the operative word!) but I need to find a really good friend, who understands me, cares about what makes me happy and wants the best for me – that’s what’s missing right now. Oh BTW I think the cheerleader has gone on holiday for a few weeks, either that or she is off hiding behind the bike sheds or something!!
Saturday, October 16th @ 1:30 p.m.
Maggies provides you a wonderfully unique shopping experience. They combine an amazing selection (always changing) of high quality products at fantastic prices, with the fun and power of social network shopping (learn more about this here). If you like saving money on high quality items you’ll love Maggie’s. Their product mix is always growing. Right now you can find fantastic deals on the finest products for you and your home, some of which we manufacture ourselves. They make wonderfully cozy comforters, pillows, and featherbeds, in our own factory in Maine. Check out their bath category for amazing towels, our sleepwear section for super soft pjs, and our new gift & decore area.
My son cannot come home to live with us. We said to even consider it, he needs one year of sobriety-- and, his energy is so strong and overpowering (as in he's a chatterbox) that I hate to give up the peace and quiet my husband and I have come to know.
We, the taxpayers, are the owners of Congress
When no rules apply
The sad truth is that we will all eventually need these drugs to suppress the mental wasteland that has been caused by the abhorrent conditions created by the government’s military industrial complex and its investment held corporations. We are the victims of ourselves, of our lack of vigilance over this machine, and of our conformity to what is pushed upon us in the guise of being “normal”. Without these drugs, we would fall out of line. We would become unproductive. We would cease to be good citizens.
4: SHIRLEY & LEE - I'm Old Enough
I don’t just hear a note or a sound. I hear a symphony. But I’m not equally gifted with the ability to put those sounds on paper.
After the match, Awesome Truth laid out the ref.
As far as one knows a cabinet minister he can do whatever he likes and nobody dares question him. It is always the poor and the have nots who get prosecuted and jailed while the politicians and their cronies who commit atrocious crimes against their states live in their mansions to enjoy their booty and ill gotten wealth. If Mr. Bernard L. Madoff had come from any country in Africa he would have been a free man by now as his political friends would have made sure he did not go to jail. Corruption case against Jacob Zuma is being dropped to allow him to become president of South Africa.
Also you can see the progress with the latest baby blanket. I've just had them all out to count how many more I need to knit...20 made and just 10 more to go now :-) It's been a real God send to me cos I have had something to grab when shooting out the door on emergency call out.....I don't need a pattern now cos I have knit so many that I can almost knit them in my sleep.....and have been really glad to have something to keep me busy.
Or, Thems the ways it goes...
And why does the patisserie on the corner taunt me with its selection of home-made, ribbon-festooned, fine chocolate Easter eggs?
yeah sounds great.
So anyways, am I crazy? It is offensive to charge someone out the wazoo for something and then treat them with all the leeway of a middle schooler, no? I just don't get it.
Imtithal, Saameira and Maisa: Yes, master.
This is the description of the product:
That was me. I’ve wanted to blog for years and I knew it had to be something about writing, but what? I am involved in so many areas of writing – writing short stories, writing memoir, writing personal essays, writing a novel (or rewriting, more accurately), writing magazine and newspaper articles, teaching writing workshops and courses, and the other side of the fence – editing books and short stories. Encompassing all that in one blog could put the posts all over the place.
And with 10 breweries in a town of under 80,000, Bend has plenty of breweries to visit. But how many is too many?
"I've never told anyone this before," he said.
2. I like to write and sketch ideas and images in a Moleskin carnet with my Lamy Safari fountain pen, black ink. I have a sketch of the four acre garden plan for Garvinweasel in my current book, along with some information architecture and cloud computing diagrams with notes on predictive analytics algorithms.
I saw Reno 911! Miami in theatres before I started watching the show, so I wasn't 100% into it at first. Even so, the movie's brilliantly dumb sequences started me on the path of conversion. Clemmie's boob tattoo! The dead beached whale! The self-pleasure-at-the-nasty-hotel montage! However, the absolute best scene has Dangle and Junior responding to a noise complaint at Suge Knight's birthday party. They have no idea who Suge Knight is. When Dangle fires his gun and ends up with a plethora of weapons pointed at him, courtesy of Knight's guests, Dangle and Junior improvise a striptease...well, Junior's improvising. You get the feeling Dangle's done those moves many times before, in front of his mirror. When I first saw Reno 911! Miami, I hadn't seen The State in years...and then I remembered why my 14-year-old self always got excited when Ben Garant went shirtless. Dayum.
Quoyloo Sandwick
Maps & Atlases are a multi-talented Chicago four piece, whose music falls in the indie-rock category on Wikipedia but in reality is anything but. On ‘Beware and Be Grateful,’ their second album, the band’s panoramic scope is realised more fully than on their slightly poppy debut, ‘Perch Patchwork.’
04. Down Again
The mounting tension.
eating no tears,
* Your coolest ghost pic is framed and hanging in the hallway with your family photos.
Overall a great lip gloss that I'd recommend!
All the witnesses who never come forward with information to help the police solve these homicides SHOULD be held over as accomplices.
Well…I’m too tired to write a full post about music tonight….that said, here are some of the best of today’s releases that you should check out:
Here I am wearing the mani I previously posted, Finger Paint Twisted over OPI Russian Navy & I added China Glaze Bahamian Escape for my tips.
2 garlic cloves, finely chopped
I went to my Martha Stewart Cupcakes book for a lemon cupcake recipe. The recipe calls for lemon zest as well as lemon juice, for lots of lemony flavor. The cupcakes turned out super fragrant, moist, and soft.
The Jury of the Competition presided over by Nanni Moretti (Italian director, actor and producer) welcomes to its ranks:
Until tomorrow, then…
‘Don’t worry about it, though.’
Ps. Arentcha glad you stopped by?
This is a little of what I saw around Milan during our first couple of days...
The review by Prof Maes showed that these treatments made people worse,
Sorry about that.
I've looked ahead at what we're scheduled to do (in order to make sure we have all our materials when we need them), and I'm pretty excited about the things we'll be studying in the next six weeks. We'll finish up with Ancient Egypt this coming week and then fly through another stint with the Israelites, Assyrians and Babylonians, touch on the Phoenicians and start studying Ancient Greece. It's going to be AWESOME!
I am going to guess if she had realized that her urethra was not the correct choice ahead of time she would have picked a different utensil.
to seek just you
The album title I Robot was inspiration behind me naming the iMac, the iPod, and iPhone for Apple.
You used to spend no more than an hour on Facebook a day, now you’ve become obsessed with reading the status updates of everyone you know back home which has spiralled into checking out their new friends as well. If you find yourself thinking anything along the lines of: “Who’s THAT girl with him?”, “Why on earth did she add him as a friend?”, “They went to that place without me!?” then you’re on the verge of becoming a full-out cyber stalker and it’s time to get a grip. Either give your friends a call to catch up, or go out! No more clicking!
Cat. #: ce.dvd_0002
Tuning Fields 127
I also tried this out on the front of my fridge, the oven door, the dishwasher front, the microwave, etc. and it left everything shining beautifully. If you are interested in some of your own go check it out here.
Le Tigre
do famous people masturbate
Before him not the ghost of shores;
through the meat between your fingers
First couple to dance - Maria Menounos and Derek Hough with a cha-cha. She told Derek she's a tomboy and not a dancer. Well, actually she said she's like a boy with boobs. Energetic and good. Their score: 7, 7, 7 = 21.
We also ordered 3 of 6 cheeses from the cheese board, served with spiced walnuts and other goodies. The Mt. Tam cheese from Cowgirl Creamery is always a favorite, and this time we also tried a 12 year aged Cheddar. Crumbly, salty, sharp goodness. And I recently found out that aged cheeses are highly likely to not cause lactose intolerance. So yes, I became your experimental subject, dear readers, and took one for the team of intolerants everywhere – and live to tell about it. I have noticed that it is true – the longer a cheese ages, the more of that nasty lactose the enzymes seem to eat, and the safer it is for us to eat. Great news for me.
After your socca has baked and been removed, top with sauce, onion/mushroom mixture, chopped fresh basil, and a few cracks of black pepper. Put under the broiler (mine was set at 525 degrees) for 3-5 minutes. Be careful not to burn it!
Me: Thank you.
I think I'll only make them upon request. No point in doing all that work if no one's interested. I'm going to eventually get more patterns of different animals. Should be fun!
“I don’t know for sure,” said Casey, “but I’m thinking that maybe you get just one go-around in life. If that’s so, I have no regrets because it’s been one hell of a ride.”
Take into consideration up to date Samsung cellular phones including the Samsung SGH-D900, Samsung D600 Chrome, Samsung D800 Pink plus Samsung D840 Black all of mobile handsets will be remarkable either concerning functions plus options. A Samsung phone mobile SGH-D900 is usually potentially a least heavy as well as slimmest 3 megapixel mobile while in the phone sector now. A magnificent cellular phone exclusively weighs 93gms gauging just simply 103 x 51 x 13 mm. A further of self-importance, a Sony D900 Red is actually a great small in size sliding off the road mobile by using a 3.13 MP camera by using hottest technological know-how contained there.
That is a regular size varigated hosta behind the giant leaves. I have had these many years and have looked for some more of them but haven't been able to find any like them.
Happy Birthday to my bff Sandy, from your daughter, Michelle.......we both love you!
I came to be a writer in a circuitous way. I was going for a master’s degree in counselling and development and my professor suggested I become a writer. He said he loved the voice in my research papers. I finished my degree but also started taking writing courses. I had always wanted to be a writer but life took down other paths.
Maybe it’s the full moon veiled by a gauze of smoggish haze. Or that my monthly ‘friend’ is creeping up on me (sorry guys). Or that I can’t up my score on Bejeweled Blitz.
My plan for the next year is to rededicate my efforts to keep my knee strong. I will go to the gym regularly. If I cannot get to the gym, I must remember to do leg strengthening exercises at home (similar to my original PT protocol).
Well, it only seems crazy until you really think about it. After all, what is a Jew? A Jew is someone who is chosen by God. And who is the “chosen” of God? All who accept and believe in His son, and someone whose heart has been cut clean of sin. A true Jew is a Spiritual Jew, rather than a physical one. And in fact, it’s this physical Judaism that Paul is speaking out against here: it doesn’t matter if you offer sacrifices, or have a prayer shawl, or whatever else. What matters is your heart.
If you answered Yes, Yes and Yes, then you're ready to enter right here!
I’ve had a couple more instances of being caught in the vibrational state of an OBE, and it never gets pleasant, particularly when I don’t sail off, as it were. The last time was real bad.
I have tried and tried to get the link to post to my blog page but it won't so after several attempts I am just going to let you know they are from Betty Crocker recipes called Happy Hour Desserts. They are absolutely yummy looking. Pina Colada Cupcakes,Mojito Bars, Strawberry Daquiri Cake, and Grasshopper Dessert Squares.
I'm still alive! Just rul busy. MFA life has opened its big grouper mouth and swallowed the minnow of normal life in one big gulp; I haven't seen my husband in almost three weeks (what the what?!) and I'm out of clean socks, but I survived my first year MFA review. I GET TO DO THIS AGAIN NEXT YEAR, MUGGLES. Four artists/critics/humanoids sat in my studio and grilled me for an hour about the work I've made this year and let's not talk about it but just praise sweet lil' baby Krishna that it's OVER.
YOUNG ADULT WRITING CONFERENCE
I have created a fun BBQ card for today.
“When Vancouver was in its infancy Mr Byrnes purchased a considerable amount of property In what is now one of the principal sections of the town , and which a couple of years ago became very valuable” (obituary notice, Times Colonist). One parcel was the site of the burned out Deighton Hoise – where Jack Deighton had moved his hotel before he died. George erected the Alhambra Hotel, although it also carried his name as ‘The Byrnes Block’. The new building was designed by Elmer Fisher, but not (initially) necessarily for George. The initial tenders for the stonework were handled by Rand Bros, a well-known firm of land agents; and the architect was still based in Victoria.
by N. Lingarow
In my head, I have images of my mother rolling out pie crust into perfectly thin, pliable rounds that fit nicely into a pie plate. For some reason, my pie crust simply would not cooperate this Thanksgiving. I made the crust three separate times. And each of those three times, I threw the crust away because the consistency wasn't right (and yes, one of the times I literally threw the crust across the kitchen out of frustration). After plowing through nine cups of flour and three cups of shortening, I decided that enough was enough. On a holiday that is about celebrating bounty, it seemed sacrilegious to waste so much food. So I whipped up a quick crumb topping and we enjoyed an apple cobbler. And you know what? It was still delicious and no one seemed to miss the crust.
Be kind and compassionate to one another, forgiving each other, just as in Christ God forgave you. ~ Ephesians 4:32
10. Ride My See-Saw
And I will leave you with a few quick cards that I whipped up with some of my kit leftovers :)
We picked up this new porch bench cushion on Wednesday, but I had yet to actually put it outside. Ryann decided it was her pillow seat and felt the need to sit on it for her snack. Ry and I packed up and headed to Grammy's house Friday afternoon. When we got there she enjoyed putting on a little concert for me, reading with Grammy, and basically being Papa's shadow. This kid LOVES her Grammy and Papa, and asks to go to their house pretty much every other day.
The 31st is fast approaching. I'm stalling like I have every mid-March since he was born. Today I'm savoring it all. I mowed the grass and he watched me from the window. I motioned for him to join me with his lawnmower and his smile was one of a winner of a million dollars. He followed me around the grass like a baby duckling.
15) 7 by 7 – Hawkwind – from “Space Ritual”
A possible solution is to approach such a project in an “un-academic” or under-theorized way to avoid further tampering with the reader’s reading (Rimstead 200, 213). However, Christian directly challenges this, equating theorizing with the survival of marginalized persons (Christian 2136, Rimstead 213). Indeed, it seems that Christian would approve of Zandy’s approach to the dissemination of anti-theoretical views (Rimstead 213, 214). As for Zandy’s editing process and the resulting process, Christian believes that we must persistently question our motives as we theorize. It does seem that some degree of bias will be inevitable so long as people act as editors, good intentions or not; the reader will simply have to seek out other anthologies to ensure he or she has a balanced perspective, or better yet, speak directly to those people of interest (Rimstead 214).
In order to weigh them against each other, you have to decide first of all whether either of the premises underlying the two theories is inherently more plausible than the other. Since neither one is explicitly presented, it comes down to which has a better claim to be such a common concept in ghost lore that it does not need to be explained to the average person.
Richie visits Joe Sodano, who has just got a microwave oven. Richie is impressed as he's never seen one before. Joe shows him a picture of a nice place in Aspen, and tells him "It's your place." Richie is insulted and puts the picture down. Joe asks "Isn't there something we can do about leaving the big guy alone?" Richie asks why he would risk their friendship over this. Joe tells him "I care what happens to you." Richie leaves, with Joe telling him there's no other choice. This reinforces Richie's suspicions about Frank.
Please be a follower of our challenge blog and please support our wonderful sponsors who are generously offering some lovely prizes :)
How can we be happy when sad things happen? There is a book called: When bad things happen to good people by Harold Kushner. Bad things do happen. Sad events occur. Whenever these situations come crashing into our lives; we question God and sometimes question our faith. Why do certain life-happenings turn some people away from God and draw others closer to God?
Maybe its the era where we have grown up in. The computer and smart phones which replaces how we communicate in our daily lives! I shall admit i am one of those who loves using my iphone to text and socialize! If you observe carefully, there are lots of cases where you can see group of friends at their gathering, using their smart phones at a point in time! Well, the other day when i was out with 4 other ladies, all 5 of us was using the phone at one time! Nobody talks till someone voices out! Thats it with communication these days and seriously when you see the articles i have below, some of the incident that happened was actually filmed on a smart phone! What is the world we grow up in becoming? How can we condone the actions of someone who has done wrong and not do anything about it?
In that period Newcastle struck again with an exquisite first-time drive from the left by Papiss Cissé who sent the ball across Petr Cech and into the top corner for his second goal of the night.
Spanish Civil War Below.
Similar legislation was also, according to the article, proposed by Chuck Schumer of NY, who has not been criticized roundly in the press for leaving out Asians and others, as well as Schumer pandering to a huge Irish electorate in New York – of course Schumer is a Democrat, therefore, in his case it may be herald as a fabulous bill, while his Republican Counterpart in Massachusetts is given the short shrift by the press.
30. As a driver I hate pedestrians, and as a pedestrian I hate drivers, but no matter what the mode of transportation, I always hate cyclists.
The final dance was performed by Jaleel White- AKA Urkel! One of the most classic TV characters of my generation. I was geeking out at the chance to see him again. THIS guy is exactly the right ft for this show. A guy who needs a career jumpstart after years of laying low, in the shadow of his iconic character. And he could be a contender! He was fantastic this week, and its only week 1! I am so pleased to see him blossom into a starpping young man and a heck of a good dancer.
Intuitives are visionaries – they always have the goal in mind before – sometimes at the expense of – the details.
I thought about trying cloth pads, but I wanted something even easier to (re)use. I wanted something that would work night and day, with a heavy or light flow, whether I was running or swimming or lying still. I wanted something I wouldn't have to think about. I wanted something that wouldn't leak. The obvious choice soon became a menstrual cup. These are soft silicone or rubber cups that sit inside the opening of the vagina, forming a seal and collecting menstrual fluids.
*Today, I tried French Baker and honestly, I experienced a foodgasm with their Chinese Hopia-Ube. It’s the first time I’ve tasted French Baker in years. The last time was when I was in high school pa. Hahaha. My late Lola in the mother side is a fan of French Baker’s baguette. But when I moved to Iloilo to study, this ritual was stopped.
I’m still here.
5:32 - Mark Lowenstein
So as I work close to the earth and the wonders of Nature, care for the little ones so in need of gentleness and love and giving it back to me tenfold, continue my studies to prepare for setting up a healing practice, and work on writing my book there never seems to be time enough to do everything. I like to update this blog weekly and am sorely behind these last couple of months, but I intend to update more often even if shorter entries. I want to reach out and touch those who are kind enough to visit, many again and again and again. You are so dear to me faithful readers. I owe you my best and I will try harder. It is pure grace to be sitting here writing an entry.
I loved that garden; a place for laughing and arguing, for fighting and playing. Never mind that it was a small back garden in south London, in my imagination it was part The Secret Garden, part Little House on the Prairie, and it came to represent for me everything that a garden should be. For a long time after I left Croxted Road, I wanted to create another garden just the same. A place for my own children to remember, somewhere they could grow up in, then return to as adults, in time bringing their own children with them.
With the Silhouette, I cut the butterfly,
From the fourteenth to the seventeenth century in England there was a time of conflict in the church and in the state. The problems were at their worst in the sixteenth century. Many people found themselves suffering for supporting what they considered to be the truth of the gospel. Not all were famous or important people even in their time, and certainly many are not remembered by name now. Some were simple ordinary people like the carpenter who made places for Catholic priests to hide in, some were priests or bishops, some were great scholars. They were not all of the same denomination either. Roman Catholics killed Protestants, Protestants killed Roman Catholics and even some Protestants killed Protestants. They each fell foul of those in authority in their day and suffered as a result, being executed as heretics and traitors.
2. Add the warm water and 2 tablespoons of olive oil and start mixing on low speed with your dough hook until the dough forms a ball (you can also do this by hand if you wish, but it’s far easier with the mixer). If it’s very sticky, you can add a little more flour until it’s a manageable ball of dough (not too much)
Erubin 21b. Whosoever disobeys the rabbis deserves death and will be punished by being boiled in hot excrement in hell.
* We live far from the big city with entertainment, so those "go" trips are limited to once a week
As of today, CSIR has 1872 active patents in India. The number of active patents in other jurisdictions is as follows: 813 in the U.S., 328 in the E.U., 147 in Japan and 829 in other countries.
Join C.J. Mills in The Honey Trap Files by clicking on the images below. All can be downloaded for PC/Kindle/PDF/Amazon/Other e-Readers.
i’m old enough
02. Bridal Dancing Queen (Full Score from "Muriel's Wedding") - Wedding Band from "Muriel's Wedding" / 3:05
On December 24th we get to see family; grandparents, great grandparents, cousins, aunts and uncles. We eat dinner, dessert and have lots of fun together.
If you would like to order one you had better be quick, these are flying off the shelves, I wanted to give all our lovely followers a heads up !! :-)
It wasn't until I'd sat in a peasant's house that I realised how small it was. How this wasn't a space for living in, but for coming home to sleep in. I hadn't realised how much stuff would be there – looms, fishing rods, buckets, scythes, hoes, bags of corn, hammers, spades, ewers, spindles and distaffs, children's toys. Like a caravan or a houseboat, everything had its place, and if it wasn't kept tidy, chaos ensued. It was this visit that taught me that 'mattress' means sacking stuffed with straw, but that ewers could – and did – come all the way from France.
She smiled coyly at him as he sank into the sofa next to Denise, who had abandoned the vibrator for the real thing. She was bent over, her hands resting on the sofa back, as Tony rammed into her from behind. Roger lay beneath her, his fingers ticking her clit, and his mouth fastening to her nipples as her tits swung free.
The thought that just crossed my mind was thinking of superheroes. Hearing the tag line: Have no fear… is here. And then remembering a motivational speaker my parents took me to see who kept singing the Mighty Mouse song, “Here I come to save the day! Mighty Mouse is on the way!”
Mali Koura (2008)
What I love about David's Bridal is that all of the dresses are affordable. Bridal gowns range in price from $299 to $1600 and carry gowns from size 0 to 26. There's a very good chance a bride-to-be could find her dream wedding dress at David's Bridal, try it on and take it home that same day.
Yes, I'm still alive!
hardest of hard-core left-liberals could never make an objective case
What if he never does?
Thanks so much to everyone that has sent me Squares particularly for this Challenge, it has been great fun receiving them! I do hope you like the Blanket.
To fill the mouth of deep defiance up
7lbs Dark LME
Yes, I said cheat yourself on TV.
As we watched the playback, the camera zoomed in on the hooker in question, eliciting a howl of anger from him. His sister was the videographer, and I'd drawn her attention from him to me. The shot corrected quickly, focusing back on Steven, but the damage was done. For every night of the run, I'd gotten a good laugh out of the crowd while he strutted and mugged, doing a poor imitation of Rick Moranis's film version of Seymour. Unpleasant realization dawned and he rounded on me, spluttering: "You, you did that on purpose!" I gave him a sickeningly sweet smile and said, "Tallulah Bankhead once glued the bottom of a glass that she proceeded to set on the edge of a cocktail table just before she left the stage. The audience was so busy staring at it that they ignored the rest of the scene."
This year will be really exciting for me, and I thought I'd pass along some of that excitement by participating in the Young Adult Faeries and Fantasy Giveaway Hop hosted by I Am a Reader, Not A Writer and vvb32reads.
What i love the most is her sweet buttery voice, speaking with calmness and vision. And that those who are around her know she sees life with clarity. She's helping plan her funeral, she's recorded songs she's sung, and she's choosing what pictures she wants for everyone to remember her by. She loves and smiles as much as she can. She is surrounded by so many people who want to do anything they can... just anything.
Aliases of politics and faith,
The man looked at his amputated hand & screamed: Oh my God, Where is my Rolex?
Sam Zarifi from Amnesty International has warned that “when a judge closes the doors on a trial it significantly raises the risk of injustice taking place.
It came out like a river once I let it out
I enjoyed this book immensely… I laughed, I cried, I commiserated. So much of her NICU experience was uncannily similar to mine – I found myself able to relate on so many levels. Reading her memoir was cathartic for me. This is a book I will definitely pick up again in a few years time.
We stigmatize people on base of name and heritage and I feel frustrated be course there is no easy way to stop this crap. Be course as long as people have ideas that you can see on somebody’s appearance that he is a terrorist we have thousand things to for with. ‘I am just saying, last year a Norwegian blond dude ordered 900 kilos of fertilizer … even people thought that was weird … nobody went there to check on him.“
Second Family Band, Veiled Gallery
Patterned in trees,
The classic New York minimalist loft was considered too constraining and inflexible. The concept therefore was to divide the space into a series of programmatic “stripes” to accommodate different functions, moods and materials and break down the length of the apartment into a promenade of experiences, from most public at the front to most private in the back. This is combined with a shifting of the rear floors to allow for three full-height levels.
And beauty is an imposition. It requires a lot of maintenance, lifestyle changes, expenses. Demanding that an average woman engages in all this extra activity and expense just to prove her social worth is unconscionable. And the irony of course is that people like Tim Gunn, who lament the anti-woman stance of fashion industry are also the same ones who engage in the whole advice regarding body flattery and creating socially acceptable shapes rather than telling women, "You know what? You are a human being with inherent worth not tied to your appearance or style or weight or interest in fashion. You can love clothes and makeup, but you are not required to; you can make yourself beautiful, but you are not obligated to, and we won't think less of you if you are ugly, fat, indifferent to fashion and not seeking male approval every waking minute."
Good morning! It's Saturday which means that it is time for another challenge here at 2 Sisters. We have another amazing sponsor this week. Please join us in welcoming one of our new sponsors this year....
I had no idea what he was talking about. "Ten pesos a letter," he said impatiently.
the older girls needed to get back to school and it was getting late.
Like I said, I don't like our living room yet. I can't figure out the direction I want to go. I have to work with the things we brought into the house like our brown leather couches and black painted furniture. I've been focusing on little things here and there and I started by focusing on the TV stand since that's what everyone looks at when they're in there. I only made a few little additions, but I think it's coming together in more of the direction I'm looking for.
My strength as a photographer lies more in seeing possibilities and using ambience ... not being "correct".
And since it is currently undergoing foreclosure, PETA has their sites set on the Florida home of OJ Simpson, now currently serving thirty-three years on charges of kidnapping and robbery committed by Simpson in an attempt to retrieve sports memorabilia which had belonged to the Hall-Of-Fame former NFL running back. The items in question were being auctioned off to meet the terms of a court settlement, a substantial sum owed the families of former wife Nicole Brown Simpson and her friend Ronald Goldman, both of whose murder Simpson was guilty of according to the judgment of the civil suit brought against Simpson by those families.
The Dash
“Big ISSUE! See? Not, Big SHOE, Big ISSUE. Now, say it again properly.”
To me, the two minutes where I assisted Inga in taking her first breaths were just that--two minutes, over and done with, and I moved on. They didn't dominate the birth experience (as they have the comments on this blog!).
As is always true when I love a book--I really really loved the characters in this one. Logan, Elizabeth, Ben, Nana, and even Keith Clayton, Elizabeth's horrible ex-husband are all great characters. You also get to read a lot of each character's inner thoughts. There is lots of dialogue of course, but it's what the characters are thinking and not saying that I find most fascinating. Their inner thoughts are what make this book great for me.
1/2 cup mild or hot fire-roasted tomato salsa
You yearn for freedom and a comfy saddle don't you? You've been feeling penned in lately and maybe need to try something mentally new to express yourself? Stop arguing so much with somebody who is close to you, and maybe consider that sometimes you need to listen as well as talk to resolve those conflicts and weird misunderstandings? You talk a good talk, but are you really up for a long walk with all that mounting baggage?
Calling out to others ‘Come see, our Lord is raised.’
04.Placebo Effect
Last layer! Finally! Red layer...Refrigerate at least 45 more minutes before enjoying (but I usually make this the day before we eat it.)
I've loved seeing this transformation -- it's as if the house has grown up with the family. As I am still making decisions on our first house, it gives me hope that even a designer has to start somewhere (where those Ikea chairs in the dining room?) and that upgrades can be made as you go. Even if Cottage Living has already knocked on your door!
George’s favourite chocolate cake – the birthday cake.
I'm looking forward to all the other projects we have scheduled for the year...we're getting good results so far!
“Enjoyment of great beer does not demand some special tasting talent. All it requires is an open mind, an interest in beer, and an eagerness to find aromas and flavors without fear of mockery.”
Pizza Cheese (as much or as little as you like)
And this better not be a joke (to surprise me) because it's getting me really pissed off.
“Well there was room to get around…” he started.
As a blind inspector from the city?
Copyright 1912, by Hall- Mack Company
Opinion polls suggest that Golden Dawn could win around 5 percent of the vote, comfortably above the 3 percent threshold for entering parliament. This would be a staggering feat for a party considered until now by many Greeks as little more than a rabble-rousing fringe group which took 0.23 percent in the last general election three years ago.
It's true. My Internet persona is way cooler than my real life one. In real life I never come up with the best responses at the appropriate times. People say things to me that are plainly just asking to be ridiculed and I can only stare at them blankly.
33. Which celebrity/public figure did you fancy the most?
I am the entertainer,
This same theme is developed in Cymbeline and, just as in Lear, the question of what the bond between servant and master should be is extended to other bonds as well, especially the nature of the bond between parent and child. King Cymbeline takes a hardline approach toward his daughter Imogen when she defies him by marrying a man below her station; he exiles her husband Leonatus Posthumous, just as Lear exiles Cordelia when she refuses to play along with Lear's public tell-me-how-much-you-love-me game. What binds one person to another just in general is a major theme of both plays.
Nicole Olson
Hiking in Italy has always inspired romance in people. When-ever you hear about Italy, there is no contract for you to Italy have sent the montreal italy vacation packages of real estate within Italy. This roaming facility could only be made available to you free of cost and this period began to bloom in art and history centers, Italy offers highly lucrative real estate purchase process is overseen by a notary in Italy took place in Florence then you may end up with outrageous bill at the montreal italy vacation packages for real estate remains a proverbial hot property in Italy, whether you just want to relax and enjoy away from the stunning stained glass windows in a slot where investors wouldn't think much before making a positive move.
Anyway, the tech was also pregnant which made me feel really awkward. And also slightly resentful? Not particularly nice or rational of me, but what can I say? It is what it is.
During the month I felt the need to up my number of games finished for this year. And that I did so with another four. X-Men (PSN) and Super Street Fighter II: Turbo Revival (GBA) were revisits.
28. The national sport of Scotland is Curly, the national hairstyle is Curly and the national dish is deep-fried Mars Bar.
Where: 543 Union Street down the alley off Nevins
There is a world out there. A huge division..with people in it..a part of it. And birds and animals…and sun and stars and there is the moon. Green grass and blue skies..which change colour. And rain!!
Song of the day: Let This Be Our Prayer - Celine Dion and Andrea Bocelli
A little over a year ago, a friend of mine told me that I should share the story of how my husband and I got our house. My friend ended up inspiring me to start blogging to share all my incredible stories.
But then, Monday came and all the rooms and surfaces in my house looked like this. Which meant we coudn't leave on our spring break trip until e v e r y t h i n g was back in it's place. Well, nearly everything.
I had several old boxes and used those to hold stuff like potatoes, onions, and other essentials. And one holds the rolling pins that I had not found a home for yet. I wish I had taken a pic of the entire kitchen before I painted it. This changed the entire look. Hubby came in and gave it a "Wow". I think he was thrilled with how it looked and thrilled with the pressure being off to build one....for the time being at least.
7 I have approx 40 pairs of shoes.
As we head towards the State Meets in XC we see some more of the norm. York (IL) and The Woodlands (TX) are both aiming for yet another State Title.
:: I recently read in its entirety the comic book series Air, by G. Willow Wilson and M.K. Perker. It's a very strange story, much in the vein of things like LOST, with weird mysteries compounding more mysteries and lots of strange goings-on, surprising revelations, plots that start small but end up huge, characters whose loyalties and status as heroes or villains isn't immediately obvious. For the most part, Air is well done and intriguing, although it does suffer from the fact that it quite obviously ends too soon. The story slowly unfolds, and then it suddenly becomes clear that the book had been canceled by Vertigo Comics, so instead of building over time, the book quickly starts to wrap up and then it ends.
I start them as soon as possible. At 2 they can pick up their toys and put their dirty clothes in the hamper, carry their dishes to the kitchen, be a "helper" as much as possible. My four year old makes his bed, cleans his room and sets the table. By 5 a child can do a LOT of chores. God made us to work and it is good for us to know how important we are to our family. Chores make a child feel
Truth be told, we want to talk it but we DON’T want to do it. We don’t know jack till we practice what we preach!
By now I needed a beer and so headed down to Kirkcaldy High Street. There's definitely been a bit of money spent on the town centre - outwith the main shopping complex the place always used to look a bit drab and run-down but now it's a lot cleaner and modern. First off I headed to Betty Nicol's at the east end of the High Street (by coincidence also surrounded by scaffolding) which has had a licensed premises on site dating back to 1742.
The pace was fast and back stage was chaotic. My segment wasn’t till the the second half of the show so I was able to mingle and watch the first half. Once the second half was ready to start I didn’t want to get lost in the craziness of the ladies so I moved my guys to the hall.
"Last week was Sun Awareness Week, even though the sun did not appear to be aware of it in many places. This weekend, however, the sun is set to return and most of us will want to get out and make the most of the good weather. It is important to remember that although it may not feel that warm despite the sunshine, the sun is very strong at this time of year."
I joined the team the latest. The first one I got close to was Chanyeol who’s the same age as me. Because we were living in the same direction, we would take the subway and go home together after practicing, we had a lot of time to talk. It turned out that he was also my friend’s friend.
WOW. Seriously, wow. I want to go live in that store. The colors, the patterns! Brought to us by Chris Burch (Tory's ex) to me this screams a mix of Tory Burch, Kate Spade and J Crew. Clothing, accessories and home decor. My kinda place. And the best part? The average item in the store is priced under $40.
I’d like to give my uttermost congratulations to my friend Thomas and I wish you all a happy, new life in Texas! My blessings to you and all your family!
I have more postcards, and change them around from time to time. I do try to be a minimalist in my postcard hoarding. Well, then I got to thinking, “Why not put up the magnets I collect when I go somewhere?” So, on the other side of the refrigerator, I put up some “travel magnets.” I have a lizard from Cancun, an Empire State Building from NYC, and a Myrtle Beach magnet, among others, hidden from the viewing public. I think refrigerator magnets are cool.
The greatest pain in life is to be invisible. What I’ve learned is that we all just want to be heard. And I thank all the people who continue to let me hear your stories, and by sharing your stories, you let other people see themselves and for a moment, glimpse the power to change and the power to triumph.
1And I saw in the right hand of him that sat on the throne a book written within and on the backside, sealed with seven seals.
About a week ago the video (click here to view it) just blew up. In roughly two days there were millions of people that were tweeting about Kony 2012 (the campaign to make him famous, NOT celebrate him) and watching the video. It was incredible to see and to see the internet coming together for one cause was fantastic.
1 canyons
I hope you make a pleasant discovery today!
Here are a few tips to help you control your ego:
Oh, and it was raining, very hard at times, which only heightened the experience for me. If you could forget for a moment that you were one of many touristas and if anything were to go wrong there would be immediate lawsuits and expensive settlements… you felt like you were in the Amazon. Without the bugs and various diseases. Needless to say, the boat ride was an amazing end to a six hour travel day.
Aldo Leopold, Paul Watson and Julia Butterfly Hill are three examples of people who became activists after significant experiences with nature.
* Honor Society as themselves
God's blessings to you,
Evolved chocolate for ethical beings. (Wait—it's much more delicious than *that* sounds.)
Labor Signs: I feel as though he could literally fall out, things are getting awkward.
Now we’ve got the “when is it present” aspect (when atoms are getting crunched, man) and we need the “what direction” to continue describing this force. I push something against the matter model a bunch of different ways with something somewhat flat and ask them what direction the force is being exerted each time. We narrow it down to the pretty elegant “perpendicular to the surfaces” idea.
Even I hate that KYHD so so much, I must thank to this song that helped me move on completely with no regret.
I really want to write today, but I have no idea about what nor do I have a good title. I guess random thoughts are pretty much all I have today. So this blog entry may make no sense to anyone, but it will help me to get a lot off my mind today. Without further ado, here are my random thoughts for the day.
But when you look more closely at how protagonists of the presumption of atheism used the term “atheist,” you discover that they were defining the word in a non-standard way, synonymous with “non-theist.” So understood the term would encompass agnostics and traditional atheists, along with those who think the question meaningless (verificationists). As Antony Flew confesses,
We’ve worked together for five years now and he is definitely an unhealthy weight. But he’s generally a really good guy and I for some reason yesterday got the urge to help him. He’d of course have to come to me, as I would never offer this to him as that would be both rude and presumptuous. We rode the streetcar together home and while he took a bus from the local station, I walked, as I always do. On that 20 minute walk as the Guardia Forest theme played on my iPod, I thought to myself if he only walked to the subway station and back every single day, he’d lose weight. He already seems to eat healthy — at least in comparison to other overweight people at my work who eat Man Chu Wok or Thai Express everyday but worry about the fat content in nuts and seeds…don’t even let me go there —and if he started walking for about 40 minutes a day I think the pounds would slowly melt away (like they are supposed to).
“When the baby grows up, people find they cannot look after it anymore as its behaviour will change a lot. That’s how some of our monkeys have ended up here.”
Wrong!
There's a story behind her name. We saw that Annabelle was close to calving, her water broke and it was quite obvious from the looks of her back end that delivery was soon. Camera in hand, we hung around for a while, but Annabelle just stood there and stared at us. Well, can ya blame her?!? We left her alone and went to feed the other horses at the big barn.
Who came up with the name Twinn Connexion?
Now you need to use the media and all your contacts to position your product to sell.
The spring was a pretty wild one this year - lots of bad weather and storms. Thankfully, the only damage done was to trees and yards. Summer was better, a little warm, but nice. Adam and I got to take a vacation in late August, the first we've had since we were first married. We went to Gatlinburg/Pigeon Forge, TN for a week. We had a blast! It was absolutely beautiful! We got out and hiked a few different places, one of them was the highest point in Tennessee - Clingman's Dome at 6,600 ft. We actually drove about 90% of the way up and then had to hike the last 1/2 mile up. It was very, very steep and cold! And there were people in sandals and t-shirts. :0 Crazy people! We also went White Water Rafting - awesome!!!! Although we were both a little scared before we got started, it was almost over before we realized it. Thankfully (if you can say that), our guide was the only one who fell out. It was actually funny, and he was pulled safely back into the raft (and apparently had to buy drinks for all the other guides later that night b/c he fell out). We also got to see a couple bears in the wild, which was neat (a little scared, but neat). It was amazing to see God's creation. I'll add a few pictures to this blog (if you have Facebook, I also have several of our pictures there, too).
Is everything okay? You sure? I’m just checking, because I’ve been noticing a disheartening trend in a lot of your newest AAA titles. Yeah, yeah…I know you’re really focused on the combat, and that’s nice and all but…what’s happened to platforming in your games? A slew of big titles were just realized that emphasized platforming and environment traversal as major gameplay elements and they…well, fell flat. In fact, I’d go so far as to say that in the attempt to widen the gaming audience, traditional environmental navigation has been all but neutered in today’s AAA blockbuster’s into a boring, tedious mess devoid of challenge or fun.
Aliens are inherently funny, even when they're drinking the marrow out of your funny bone. These are ten of the best alien-themed sketches this side of the Crab Nebula (and no, Coneheads is not #1).
Sexual propaganda for fuddy duddies? ‘Nice’ subculture to represent Makow, but not for everyone, and don’t preach this to simply ensure ‘freedom of thought’ and ‘freedom of choice’ . . . ya closet Tory . . . maybe a 18+ warning on your site? (i.e. Views Expressed About Sexuality On Site are Orwellian, please leave if you are offended by this sort of material . . . Continue – Tory-minded Nerds and Toffs Only – Return to Previous page – Alpha Males who watch Porn and are ‘Hypersexual’ bisexual and trysexual . . . ).
We've also got the boards (I'll call them drawer slide supports) cut and painted. One side of the wall will need 2x2s to attach the drawer slides to it because the inside door frame sticks out further than the wall by nearly an inch. If we installed the drawer slides directly to the wall, then you wouldn't be able to open the drawer past the door, hence the need to add a 2x2 in there. We're going to use 1x2s on the other side since that will allow us a wider drawer than if we were to use a 2x2 over there as well.
Main Stream Media let the light shine in and cease feeding us politically correct “Crap Sandwiches”. Crap sandwiches credited to Michelle Malkin. Beautiful.
Ever since my first visit to southern Europe many years ago, I have had a sweet spot for Bougainvilleas!
In 231 days ill be a new mom- again- to an incredible life. and ill consider myself the luckiest Mom alive if they teach me just half of what Makenzie taught me.
A4 Times Square Preachers - A Better Tomorrow
Questions remain about why Dewani is fighting extradition and not returning to South Africa to face the trial.
The reason for shopping at Macy’s, like we need a reason, is that I didn’t have a dress to wear to American Idiot on Saturday and Leanne didn’t have shoes. Well shucks, guess we’ll just go shopping. ;)
But nothing, nothing I did for this show was out of self-interest. I volunteered to be stage manager because I wanted to help the show and because I love being with the people in the theatre department. Hell, if I just wanted to make myself look good, I would have chosen a much easier job.
RELEASE DATE: August 17, 2012
A pedestrian cross was installed. And still the cars did not slow down.
But as I've said before, it would be a nice touch if, as we left AfPak we took out Pakistan's nuclear facilities and perhaps kidnapped their rogue nuclear scientist AQ Kahn and took him to a nice, isolated interrogation room to find out exactly what he sold and to whom.
flicks a tail like a handkerchief
I think this might be my favorite episode of season 3 (the power of the Decade Dance) because it rocked my emotions to the core and gave us the biggest twist since Klaus compelled Stefan to turn off his emotions (a scene that still makes me cry) in episode 5 of this season. It’s a few hours later and I’m still having trouble processing this episode, which can only mean that it’s amazing.
2. Unschooling
Full length Hoods retail for around $79 and the half size ones are about $69
B) “Imports of farm products jumped 16 percent to 5.58 trillion yen in 2011″
In the present, Roy half sleeping, laughs at the memory, awakening when Myra shows up. She says "Well, that's fine. Two months we've known each other, you're already so bored you fall asleep before I get here." They start fooling around.
After that, I found a chipboard glittery letter set to put the baby's name on the banner.
Sheik Yousuf Al-Qaradhawi: Eight years ago, I visited Iran, in the days of President Khatami. He held a grand reception for me, as did all the officials and ayatollahs in Iran. They received me in a great way, and welcomed me, but I said to them: If we really want to get closer, several things are unavoidable. For one, we must avoid provocations, about which we cannot reach an agreement. One such thing is that you must stop saying that the Koran is incomplete. Most of the Shiites believe that the existing Koran is the word of God, and they interpret it, and rely on it in their jurisprudence and everything. But they say that this Koran is not the entire Koran. They say that the Koran was twice the size of this Koran, that the Al-Ahzab chapter was twice the size of whatever, and this or that chapter was twice the size of whatever… All this talk about the Koran is unacceptable. Some of them reject these things, while others believe in them. I said to them: We must be quiet about the Koran and about the Sunni imams – Al-Bukhari, Muslim, Abu Hanifa, Al-Maalik, Abu Hanbal. Even more important is to refrain from cursing the Prophet’s companions.
The advantage of Wells' 7-point structure is that it combines 3-act and Benny Hill. It goes:
You looked at me again, your blue eyes turning almost liquid and I wondered if those were the tears that I wouldn’t be allowed to see. You nodded. “I’ll come back to you, I promise.” Another simple statement that hid another monumental fear. We didn’t acknowledge either of our fears though. Those are our private demons that we struggle with alone and that’s the way it should be. You squeezed my hand twice before you let it slip out of yours. And then suddenly, there was nothing else to say. It truly was time to go.
Ahh pub crawls. You know you have been on them at least once, you go out with your friends, get bombed and the last bar you get to you act like an asshole. Imagine having 3 of those in one day. Now I understand you have been out all day drinking and sometimes dressed like a moron but is it necessary to not tip at all?!
So each year we see this great ritual, where the government of the day pretends to ask us for money, and we have to watch the empty charade of approval being given – only then to see vast amounts being spent on things of which the majority of us do not approve, such as the European Union.
Here's where the magic happens.
SH: No you don't.
At the very least you need to update your policies to cover social computing. But you’ll also probably want to monitor social media to detect any disclosures that do happen. In fact, it’s even possible that failure to do so may leave you open to charges of negligence. Consult a lawyer for information about your responsibilities regarding social media disclosure.
the walls of Jevišovice
1/2 tsp ginger
The post in question was for the letter C, where I discussed being one of the co-hosts of this year’s A to Z Challenge. I guess to the commentor I came off sounding a bit cocky (or a lot cocky…don’t really know). It gave me pause and made me think about some things. That resulted in this blog post…lucky
they don’t exist
Of course, some people like coal. Some people like a little continuance on a story arc, too. Lots of others like Santa Claus, exciting stories and horror movies that make you want to watch what happens in them. I wouldn't suggest any of these people watch Silent Night Deadly Night Part 2. Unless they're just short on coal.
want so give to people who inspire you u,give to people
The highway south out of town runs directly beside the ocean. It’s my first sight of the Caribbean and it’s as clear, blue and sparkling as I had imagined it would be. Tufts of palm trees sprout from the golden sand to nod and sway in the sun. Locals on bikes smile and greet us as they pass, their tyres cutting tracks in the feathers of wind-blown sand which stretch across the tar-seal.
Here are pics of my projects -
15. It was also hoped that Martha would team up with Sarah Jane in the climax of season two of The Sarah Jane Adventures. When Freema became unavailable, the Brigadier was used instead.
And this surely ought to raise questions in our minds. Much is made of wisdom in the opening chapters. Solomon is the ‘wise man’ of his generation (cf 1 Ki 4:31). Moreover, this wisdom is a gift from God himself (see chapter 3). If we were reading Kings for the first time, we would surely be saying to ourselves that wisdom is clearly of the utmost importance. And yet after Solomon, there is no more wisdom.
Basic human psychology is that people hate being forced to do something. They really hate it. But when they think they’re doing it themselves they’ll embrace doing that thing that they hated only a minute ago and go even a step further. Think about the American Revolution, we started a war on a 2 cent tax on per metric ton of a breakfast beverage because it was forced on us but when it was our own representatives doing it, hell, let’s tax everything to death! (A little hyperbolic, I’ll admit, but I think you get the point). People are stubborn by nature, but Americans especially have a “bet me” attitude. Another example, when was alcohol consumption highest? When it was illegal. To this day when does the alcohol intake for most people drop radically? The day after they turn 21…when it’s no longer a chance to stick it to the man, it loses a little something.
For those of you who have never seen This is Spinal Tap, it is a fake documentary about an aging, has-been heavy metal band. Essentially a satire of musicians and the music business in general, it’s an extremely funny look at a fictional band, Spinal Tap, but with scenes depicted with such dead-on accuracy that many real-life bands have amusingly reflected on their own real-life “Spinal Tap” moments over the years. One such scene takes place in a record store, where the band is there to sign their latest album. Only nobody shows up.
I've been looking for a reason to use Bella Blvd's 'Tail Waggers & Cat Naps' paper. It's so cute. It has multiple squares of sayings and wonderful border strips. I decided to use the 'Spoiled Rotten' square. It brought in a very primary color scheme. Behind all the Bella Blvd, I used Bo Bunny's Calypso laugh for the background. It was a solid white with just enough white to soothe the eyes. I also wanted to bring in some texture by using my Fiskars edge punch around the photo.
For note: I humbly apologize for the delay between postings, but school, family, ministry, and future ministry have sidetracked my attention for a while.
Wishing you a fabulous day and thanks for sharing a bit of yours with me :)
A. Experienced newspaper people, particularly those with a mixture of reporting and desk experience, have skills that are marketable outside of newspapers. It’s not easy to find those jobs, but they are out there.
The arrival of missionaries to the Yup'ik and other Native tribes began to change the making and use of masks among the Native Americans. The missionaries denounced their masked dances as heathen rituals and their use was practically eliminated by the 1920's.
My fingers leave
Nelson Mandela has long had strong ties to the MPLA, as the Marxist Angolan regime has provided Mandela's African National Congress with a haven for its terrorist training bases.
1/8 tsp celery salt
“I think there is a feeling that there is too much difference there,” Mr. Wymore said. But he said he believed: “This is the seat. This is the community that’s ready to go forward.”
undecided which to choose. So, I made one side 'raw'. (I actually was going for a little darker
Thomas, Caroline and Joe decided it would be fun to run in the annual Spartan Race up at Soldier Hollow! It is an 8- mile run with a series of obstacles and tests throughout it. We thought it would be fun to do next year with all of us... maybe in matching outfits (... how cute is that?) but after watching them I may be rethinking that decision!!!
Alfred on the other hand, as far as I know, didn't have an exceptional war, and won no medals that I know of. His loss though, for his mother and family must have been equally catastrophic. I found myself wondering about how he and Ernest would have been, had they lived. I knew all their surviving siblings: Mabel(May) my grandmother, her sister Madge, and youngest brother Herbert. I recall them all with much affection, though May died when I was relatively young. It seems strange to think there were two other great uncles whom I might also have known. And that is the tragedy of World War 1 for so many families, no one in the country was unaffected by it. Owen's phrase "the pity of war" was an apposite one.
Moriarty quotes Rilke: “However vast outer space may be, yet with all its sidereal distances, it hardly bears comparison with the dimension, with the depth dimension of our inner being, which does not even need the spaciousness of the universe to be within itself almost unfathomable.” (Invoking Ireland P201/202).
24. An Officer And A Gentleman (Richard Gere & Debra Winger) – It’s a white trash classic.
We returned home and had two very relaxing days at home. And to top it all off we had a wonderful day at Shane's parents house yesterday for Easter. J had a very ruff day. She fell several times and hit her head quite a bit. Add in no nap, and ruff may be an understatement! But she absolutely loved the egg hunt. One of her favorite things to do is collect things in a basket or bag, so this was right up her alley. She only had one melt down when she got a stick caught in her skirt and it made her very upset. The best part was when Shane took the stick out. With tears running down her face and still screaming out of frustration, she continued to pick up eggs and put them into her basket. It was quite a sight, but I thought it was hysterical!
She: Can I trust you?
Former Microsoft India head, Ravi Venkatesan was appointed as additional director on the board. In the middle of its biggest management transition ever since Infosys was founded, the company is aiming for a larger share of revenue from retail, banking and healthcare customers by shifting the roles of leaders handling multiple business units.
This book was provided to me by the author for review with the understanding that would have no bearing on the content of the review.
The question caught me by surprise. I thought hard before answering.
‘She replied, “… Since you have given me land in the Negev, give me also springs of water.” So Caleb gave her the upper and lower springs.’ (V15, TNIV)
It takes about three or four months for me to write a book. I only write one at a time but, quite often, I'll be dealing with other stories at different stages at the same time. For instance, in July I was out and about promoting the latest Medusa book - The Rescue, while dividing the rest of my time between writing the next one, Hunted - and checking over proofs of Blood Ransom.
Besides - I have way better hair.
I had seen a few of my friends posting facebook statusi (statuses, statuspeople?) about this couch to 5k running program (C25K) and I decided to give it a shot. I loved it! The first time I went, I came back so high on endorphins – sunshine, no children, no worries, just me and the pavement. I got through the third week and found out that I was 7 weeks pregnant (another girl). So, I had to stop. I gained about 25 lbs total.
My clients always have questions about foreign rights, especially as we get closer to the big book fairs, because my clients are very smart and ask smart questions. I thought I would talk about what goes into preparing for a fair, and how I did so a few years ago as a foreign rights agent, and how I do so now as an agent who still handles rights for her children's books.
My kids (9 and 12) loved this book. Spinelli has a poetic, jazzy kind of voice. His word combinations are surprising and refreshing—definitely a fun-to-read-aloud kind of book. In our home, this brought up a lot of discussion about segregation and racism. We had read William Armstrong's Sounder and Mildred Taylor's Roll of Thunder, Hear My Cry recently. Maniac Magee brought the problem of racial tension into the middle part of the century. (The time period isn't named, but I'd put this in the 1950s-70s.) I highly recommend it not only to help understand the ignorance that perpetuates stereotypes, but as a fun read. My nine-year-old wanted to read it again right away.
There is not a lot to the book. We learn about the events leading up to the child’s hospitalisation, the wait to see if she would recover, the realisation that she would not, her death and their initial reactions afterwards. One Amazon reviewer had this to say:
“JMU has helped me really see how I can make a difference and what I am capable of doing, even if it is simply on a small scale. Working through the engineering program has been challenging, especially since we are the first class, but I think it is exciting that my class will serve a crucial role in defining what JMU engineers can do. Beyond engineering, JMU has allowed me to explore different opportunities (such as the iPad app) that I never could have thought up and executed alone. Music has also been an important aspect in my life and JMU was one of the few schools that really gave me the opportunity to still pursue a technical major without having to sacrifice my love of saxophone. For that I am truly thankful, as I have truly met some of the best people I have ever met and am glad to call many of them my friends for the rest of my life.”
So when I say that it was 'easy' to make the transition to a plant-based diet, I say that with a ton of asterisks attached. I lived a life prior and had some hardships prior that MADE it a no-brainer. I had two choices before me.
08 Elpida - He Will Come He Will Come
The runners finished between 11.5-16 hours. They all agreed that this run was the hardest thing they had ever done. I was very pleased and inspired by the hike Rob and I had completed and to be around the folks that ran rim to rim to rim. The whole experience and power of the canyon was what I needed to get myself back on track with running. My time will come and I will come back to run with the power of the canyon.
77. Winterspring Frostsaber – complete 20 dailies
And then the others appear in one large singing, swaying mass.
And one final note.. I would not be true to the name MissPrettyPerfect if I didn't let you further know what all MissPrettyPerfect stands for in my mind. And this currently situation is just another testimony to share with you, and not to mention, a Perfect example. It's all about creating a positive and perfect surrounding, even though in reality, that is not exactly the case. The name MissPrettyPerfect represents strength and an ability to Know that everything is going to be alright regardless the outcome (Faith). We may not live in a Perfect world, but we have the ability to make it one for ourselves and our families.
Well it’s official, the Whale Sharks are back! First sighting of a single adult just over a week ago, two more at the start of the week and then six spotted yesterday. Now that they are appearing in greater numbers the chances of seeing them obviously increase. Between now and early April we should be seeing more and more of these beautiful, gentle giants. They are attracted here by the plankton that starts to appear in the Mafia Channel from September onwards. We have actually seen them here year round, especially when there are young as the channel appears to act as a nursing ground – but the odds increase during the Kaskasi (north-east monsoon season)
Session 3, on Saturday afternoon, will bring our attention to The Horizon, where the presenters will suggest hopeful possibilities of where we might be going in our collective effort of youth ministry.
Dunlaw recalled the incident.
I've already started a piece which will utilize them. Here's just the start....I'll show you the rest as it comes together. Suffice it to say, one of the arched pieces will go inside.
Like Mr. Tiomkin, Heinz Roemheld has solid classical background. After initial training in the United States, he studied with masters in Berlin Philharmonic. From there he moved to supervision of music for German films, finally coming back to the United States to direct the scoring for such memorable films as "Yankee Doodle Dandy" (an Academy Award work), "Down To Earth" and "Valentino". His most recent work is the music for "Ruby Gentry", translated into popular music as Ruby. This theme is deep and warm, with a minor cast that gives it a hint of the blues, altogether in keeping with the setting and motivation of the film. Taken out of its context, the theme retains its quality as an individual idea, and contributes much to the current return to the ballad in popular music. In Percy Faith's fine setting, Ruby is another shining example of the beautiful themes currently in use in Hollywood.
I wasn't looking for something that was more,
5; Kings; 6
Call me Alvin Ho. I was born scared and I am still scared. And this is my book of scary stories.
So maybe the part about scripts that doesn’t work for me is the format. That’s an important thing to know, at least when it comes to writing Screnzy.
Freshly-ground black pepper to taste
Of course that’s just dedicated e-readers and all you have to do is look at the list in Wikipedia to see that there is plenty of competition out there with the Sony Reader, the BeBook Neo and the Kobo eReader Touch to name just three. Fashion is a fickle thing though and technology moves at a ferocious pace. How many mobile phones have you been through since, say, 1983 which is when the first 1G network launched in the USA (make that 1981 if you’re Scandinavian or 1979 if you happened to live in Tokyo)? I hardly ever use my mobile phone. If I spend £10 in a year on calls that’s a lot because basically I only call two people, my wife and my daughter, and somehow I am on my fourth phone! Okay, I lost the first one but you see what I mean. Of course my daughter gets a new phone every year. And many of those phones double as e-readers anyway.
There is NO FEE to submit work.
O what peace we often forfeit, O what needless pain we bear,
Norma needs help. Facebook etiquette help. I know, I know, what the fuck am I
The vacuum seemed to work. After just a few minutes of intense pulling and twisting and yanking, my darling baby girl was finally freed.
I didn’t get any polka dot blocks done this week – I am sad but hope to work on them later this week. I have some customer quilting to get done first.
Everyone ran after the chicken.
- suitable for 1yr and up
So, as I climb and jump out of my box I find time to do all the old things
When I started this blog way back in June of 2011, I wasn’t sure what to write about and that continues to be a problem. Or perhaps I should think of it as a challenge since problems are problematic while challenges are, well, challenging, though challenge feels like a more positive word. Of course, it could be a problematic challenge which would be the best and worst of both words and worlds.
So, if you want the latest and greatest as soon as it’s ready, you need an iPhone.
By making this choice, I'm not saying that you wouldn't end up having the others as well, they may just not turn out the way you wanted them.
There is nothing difficult in seeing that if these three distinct beers — the one matured, the other mild and clean, and the third half-fermented, be mixed together in different proportions, we can secure a great many varying flavours, degrees of fulness, and tendency to early cask condition.
Choate lands a jab. Leg kick by just as Choate lands another jab.
Giving a talk to journalism students at the University of Central Lancashire, at the end of November, Company Editor Victoria White said: “Although magazines are in decline, brands and content are still needed – we are no longer magazines, we are brands’’
Now that I'm older and it's practically pointless, I wonder: what did he think of his life as he lay dying? During those final months, knowing he was out of chances to make things right, knowing it was too late to start on another path and redeem the time he had left, did he have regrets?
Next was the only one I felt didn't work, the Saison de la Tete.
He used a container-analogy, explaining that teaching a class online was just like choosing between a “truck or a van or a car” to “deliver” a package. I countered that this translation did not hold up. Learning is a cognitive process of uncertain duration that transpires between the time a concept or idea is launched and whether (or not) it lands in the student’s mind in a way that will be sustained beyond the moment.
You can also stock up on basic turtle necks and tops which are ridiculous at 7-15€, and sweaters running from 10-20€, all good deals and lots of sizes. Some beautiful little touches with beading and sequins that class up the classic.
Adhesive: Beacon Adhesives Zip Dry, Stampin' UP!
Now, for some challenges...be sure to check them out if you need some inspiration!
Suddenly we’ve been plucked from the front-lines, our lives in the balance, and now we find ourselves caught up in a victory we could never have won. Now we’re shouting with joy and advancing on the Philistines to plunder them.
Just like the disciples at the beginning of the Emmaus road, we can forget what it's like to be with Jesus. All the sad things can keep us from seeing, hearing and smelling the goodness of God that is always with us. Catching a whiff of fresh baked bread has a way of bringing the good, to comforting and the sweet back into reach of our senses that need his presence and peace.
After several hours, we headed back to our condo to get ready for the evening.
Why, you ask? Where do I start?
Thanks for a great sketch this week Priscilla. And I welcome back the MMSC DT to my blog! It's been way too long and I've missed you all! Thanks for stopping by!
I read so many people's blogs and stories about their adoptions; about adoptions from The Bad Place, or other special needs adoptions, or domestic adoptions. The common theme from all of them is that, in most cases, these families need help to complete their adoptions and they are asking for it. Whether they are doing fundraisers, giveaways, or simply asking for donations, these families are asking for help.
This book has violence, war and evil at it’s core and to bring that to life, McCarthy shows us evil unleashed.
Happy Birthday, Dad!
Not only a star athlete with dreams of joining the Air Force, Danielle is a caring and responsible daughter and sibling who LOVES her family, enjoys charity work and volunteering, youth group, traveling, sight seeing and history.
Today in class, we folded origami cranes. Origami Cranes show the hope that was displayed after the Oklahoma City bombing, and the optimistic thoughts of people around the world that better times will come from the insight and strength of the Oklahoma City community. In the museum, there is a whole exhibit on just origami cranes. We’re sending ours to the Oklahoma National Memorial and Museum to be stored in the archives with all the other cranes that have been sent over the years. It is our hope that people will remember what happened in Oklahoma City on April 19, 1995 forever.
It's all about playing live. Of course we try to make our albums as great as we can but this kind of music is so much about live performance. We love to play live.
Bette Midler asks Helen Hunt, “Well, aren’t you going to pray?” shortly before the process of implanting the egg begins. Helen Hunt responds that “no”–she doesn’t want to pray. The two women argue over this and even fight a little–pushing/shoving/restraining each others’ hands. Bette Midler (birthmom) finally says to Helen, “Well, maybe you don’t want it badly enough.”
3 years since I looked into the solemn face of a grief counselor, as she called me "Grandma".....
Below is a list of links to various IP publications, sorted by firm. Only firms that publish regularly on IP are included.
1/4 cup balsamic vinegar
I mean, there's no such thing as a guaranteed win, any given Sunday and all that (lord knows last season proved it) but still.
Finally, for people who love the philosophical as well as the historical implications of things, there's The History of White People by Nell Irvin Painter ($27.95, W.W. Norton & Company) in which the author “offers a comprehensive assessment of western ideas of race, beauty, and blood from antiquity to the present time, deftly demonstrating that all three are concepts evolved by dominant cultures rather than based on biological fact.” This is not everyone’s cup of tea, but it must be said it is not as boring as one might assume. There is surely something to be said for the Caucasians who proved to be the discoverers of scientific truth and the most innovative race in recent centuries. That said, the Chinese were writing poetry while our ancestors were still deep into the Dark Ages. No one race is “superior” to one another since we all share the same DNA. Weaving together all that we know at this point, this book challenges our presumptions.
I've been asked to choose a selection of travel posts for a monthly Travel Round-up on BritMums, which, as many of you know, is Britain's biggest parent blogging network.
I walked in and was greeted by the lovely hostess and grabbed a seat at the counter, about 5 stools in from the door. The service was quick, and a bus boy came over promptly asking if I wanted bottled, sparkling, or New York's finest water. I quickly browsed the wine list in hopes that I would find a nice Rosé, and I did. It was a 2010 Domaine La Suffrene Bandol Rosé (France, Provence, Bandol), and we'll talk about it more in another post on here eventually.
Surgeons digressions.
I remember walking past Crown during those days and reading a sign in the window to the effect that that Rubashkin family was being persecuted. In 2010, Sholom Rubashkin, the former manager of the meat plant, was sentenced to 27 years in jail.
The Red Clouds: Pink spun sugar, black coconut, patchouli leaf, sugared incense, benzoin resin, red musk, and pomegranate dust.
health or character; changes that are consistent with the will of God for you.
Third, maybe wear white. I know. White. It's usually a disaster. And if you are the kind of girl who drinks cosmos or cape codders or midori sours or whatnot, ignore this one. But! Consider putting down your sugarbomb in an up glass and think about it. You can NEVER wear a white fun party dress. You can't get away with it while attending a wedding (if you are balking at this one, I swear I'm going to come kick you in the shins) and few other occasions call for a fancy dress. So, if you are like me and bought an adorable white and silver dress for after my wedding and then never got to wear it again...bust it out tonight. Just remember that vodka tonics look clear, but they glow under a black light. I'm just saying. It's science.
Should I buy it? Die! Die, you stupid bitch. What? Leave me alone; I’m almost through level 257. Stop looking over my shoulder. Oh, now, SEE WHAT YOU DID? Do you WANT me to stab you with my seam ripper? No? Then leave me alone until I finish this level. God. Kids.
Network: FOX
The Webster dictionary defines a lighthouse as a tall permanent structure equipped with a usually revolving beacon light giving a signal to warn ships at night or in fog of the proximity of rocks, shores etc.
Sunday: cross-training – and I actually did it! I usually just relax on Sundays, but I decided to use the elliptical for 55 minutes before heading to an Indian’s game with B and his parents. Thanks to B’s job, we had great seats — and they won! Below, some photos from the game, and one post-training.
There are people in your life who change you, they help you to be a better person. One of those people was my Nonnie. As most of you know, she passed away this fall and there is still a little hole in my heart. I've been sorting through photos and reminiscing about the things we did as kids, young adults, and even as older adults. My Nonnie was a special lady, and I am lucky to have had almost 40 years with her. I absolutely adore this picture of my sister and I with her. Although I tease my sister that she looks like she is playing favorites here! ; ) I used my Cricut to cut all of the hearts on the background paper. Some hearts were backed with patterned paper and some were left open. The entire background was placed on dimensional foam circles for dimension. I added the title, "Love U More...." and added a bit of lace and twine.
large number of rejection letters. With such a varied and promising field
- White Pizza w/ mushrooms & truffles, Chop salad bite, chocolate truffle
so I wanted the alternate color so I can tell them apart and track the mileage on each. These are my first pairs of Brooks after several years of running with ASICS. They were recommended to me while I trying on the ASICS I planned to buy. The Brooks just felt more comfortable and I’ve done several runs on the first pair and I really like them.
We are raising adults and they need to be equipped to handle life on their own, to be confident and to know they can handle anything. They are worthy and can make the choices they need to.
Allah is our objective. The Prophet is our leader. The Qur’an is our law. Jihad is our way. Dying in the way of Allah is our highest hope.
Today I had a counselling session. My uni, I imagine like most unis, does them for free. You get a referral when you fill out a form online, where you get an hour and a half so they can assess you. Then they offer you a follow up. Then if you’re like me and have ‘previous’ (by this I mean you’ve been in counselling before) they tend to ask you to come in for more sessions of 50 minutes.
Its just that there are’nt that many sugarcane juice operators that i know of in islamabad. And the few that i do know of aren’t that easily accessible by car. For all the flak that vehicle owners get, i thing some of it is unjustified because we don’t access to all the cool roadside food stalls and juice and refreshment carts that are set up at strategic spots that are frequented by the cyclists, motorcyclists, and public transport users.
For me, bird-watching isn’t always about the birds that you see, but about the experience along the way and the great times you have searching for them. Here are a few examples from my birding experiences:
Carey Mulligan plays 16 year-old Jenny convincingly. Jenny is a top high school student aiming for Oxford as she graduates in a few months, an aspiration directed by her protective yet gullible father (Alfred Molina). Oxford is certainly within reach. Jenny is smart, talented, and self-assured. She has all the potentials needed to excel academically and to launch a successful future in life. She loves art, foreign films, classical music, and French pop culture. The city of her dream is, naturally, Paris.
While summer is traditionally a time of relaxation, especially for students, my summers are quite the opposite. For those of you who know me, you know that my idea of relaxation is having fifty things to do in an hour instead of 100, and this summer has been no exception. And the influx of business resulted in very few blog posts so I have been unable to share the growth with you, but hopefully I will find the time soon to catch up on my updates!!!
Ok I guess that’s it. Ya don’t gotta go home but ya can’t stay here. Good luck and happy gamblin even if it is just a FANTASY.
That banked up to it,
Traditional Donut Holes (using flour, whole milk and sugar) = 170 calories, 5.7g fat, 3.8g protein, 26.6 carbs, 0 fiber
That'll be a reference not to Desmond Tutu but to Desmond Morris, whose books on animal behaviour were much read throughout my Zoology degree course, specifically The Naked Ape & Manwatching, except in my case this was Germanwatching (not naked German - shudder).
Like I said before, we were on 4 hours of sleep in 36 hours. It was 4:00 AM, and we had been in travel mode since 11:00 AM the day before. We were in pretty awful moods. I wanted to be home to see my puppies and kitty. We had just been hating life two hours before. And that's when I burst into tears.
College saw a sharp decline in the number of blog posts I made. I developed some kind of social life. I became a radio DJ and community leader of sorts. I had at least three jobs at all times. I was a machine who used the Internet for community leverage, last-minute research binges, and socially-accepted stalking, but little else. It was during this time that I realized that venting everything you’re thinking on the Internet isn’t the wisest, because a community of peers meant a community of people that actually paid attention to what it was you were generating and criticized it as such.
I ruffled some white crepe paper around the circle and glittered the edges in black glitter. I used primary colors for him as it was an elementary school graduation.
The passion fruit is actually so bright and fruity, it will take you to a balmy tropical place. Say, Martinique. C'est vrai!
With hardly any form, a stiff breeze would have blown it all to bits
The tree was properly sniffed and surveyed by the cats, and then I set to rehearsing music for the concert on Saturday. Just having the tree in the house and still feeling the memory of that brisk, sleety wind on my cheeks helped the spirit of the music. It really flowed.
I google “How to get rid of the smell of vinegar”.
Finnegan
"please"
Had a brother at Khe Sahn fighting off the Viet Cong
A good point.
This is where God is seeing if I’ll actually follow through.
3. Who should “count” as a minority for purposes of affirmative action? Anyone with minority roots? Or only those who are one-fourth or one-half minority?
It is said that every generation has its own Shakespeare and I suspect that the same will apply to Beckett. Whether Shakespeare in modern dress dilutes the quality of the writing or Waiting for Godot performed by an all-female cast somehow sullies the work, I’m not going to debate, but as generation follows generation, people find they can relate to these plays in new and unexpected ways. The more I thought about it the more I realised I was more interested in Didi and Gogo: The Next Generation than trying to imagine younger versions of these much-loved characters.
In my experience, it is rare to find marketers who remember that they are people too. They buy cars, shampoo, chilled desserts and insurance policies, just as their customers do. While they may be unusually attuned to marketing communications and brands, their fundamental motivations, behaviours and beliefs do not distinguish them significantly from the ‘ordinary’ folk they would like to buy their stuff. But, to look at many of the marketing ideas I am asked to research, you would never know it.
Albert Camus
I Can’t Believe It’s Not Butter! Save $.75/2 products (4/22)
Every day I feel his absence. Every day, in some way, I try to rework the events of the past few months so that he really will return to me. But that is not going to happen in this lifetime. And so I trudge the hills of grief, and treasure the moments of comfort I find.
Tuna salad with apples
I was 2 months pregnant here. When we planned for this trip in November last year, I never thought I would be pregnant that soon.
1. Christian cultists (no different from other cultists who think they are the only ones who are right) who find fault, judge and condemn other Christians in their church, and in other churches (just like the devil 'Rev. 12:10'), and all the unsaved for their misbehaviors instead of spending the time necessary praying and helping all they come in contact with get closer to God or helping them get saved. Never should we waste our time finding fault with others when we as sinners need God as much as anyone else and need to spend our energies only helping others walk with God (Rom. 14:10).
This is the first of two tracks in this post featuring Pitbull, who I am slowly coming to like more and more, thanks in large part to his 3 collaborations with Jennifer Lopez. I am a huge fan of Jennifer Lopez’s music and was really excited to hear this song. “Dance Again” is kind of funny because J. Lo herself has said that she isn’t sure where it is going to be featured, either on an upcoming greatest hits album or her next studio album, so that is kind of strange. Either way, I am glad it’s out! I absolutely love this song – it is so catchy and fun and follows in Jennifer’s absolute best sound, in my opinion, urban-influenced dance music. I definitely feel that her best music is the stuff in this style, including one of my favorite songs of her entire career and one of her previous collaborations with Pitbull, “On The Floor.” This song is so much fun to listen to, sing along to and dance to that I definitely recommend everybody download it! It is so much fun!
10. it annoys James when you don't break the label of the wine bottle before opening. You think, why waste time?
Girls’ Generation’s Tiffany, whose Korean name is Hwang Miyoung, confessed that she dislikes being called by her Korean name.
This was my THIRD High school... this time in Wilmington,Dela-where?
Thanks goes out to all of you for the inspiration you provide me. It's a great thing to have a piece of my heart grow with your continued advancement in the blogosphere.
I called the school to make sure she was in class and alright. Well, I tried to call the school, but my fingers wouldn't work properly and it took a few tries. Once I got through the secretary said she'd check. Normally at this point the secretary would come back on the line to deal with what ever we were talking about. Instead it was the Vice Principal. He started questioning me about who I was and what I wanted. If I could I would have jumped through the phone and shaken him! I'm glad they protect student privacy and he did the corrrect thing but I was in an acute state of distress.
Cessna in late March announced two agreements that involved joint ventures to build aircraft and expand other general aviation activities in China.
I have recently acquired some lab equipment and some agar and plan to start my own yeast bank based on yeast slants shortly, I'll blog about it when I get that far.
Despite all these signs and symptoms of impending doom I still FEEL young. As a matter of fact, I feel doggone good. When I was a boy I remember looking upon people my present age and thinking, “how decrepit”. But now that I am here, it’s not so bad (except for the whole lactose thing).
You'll find that life is still worthwhile
And, now for our Main Event….
Brinsley Schwarz - Guitar, Vocals
- For a lot of people, it seems axiomatic that because they don't involve paper and ink, ebooks are very cheap to produce. Author and former agent Nathan Bransford explains that it ain't necessarily so. Why? Because paper doesn't actually cost very much.
‘Rammy’ was a few inches over six feet and slender. His clothing impeccable. Soft cream colored pants, ironed smooth and a new-wave shirt of white, the kind with the lapel that reached far across the breast to buttons hidden under a smooth long white leather coat that ran down the length of the creatures body to the heels of its soft gray shoes. Rammy looked up at Zero, the scowl replaced by a warm cool smile crested with eyes of a soft, heavenly blue.
(1) Reducing the debt burden. This country will have a debt:GDP next year of about 120% of which 40% has arisen from bailing out the banks and the remaining 80% comes from our initial debt in 2007 plus the deficits that we have run up since. There is a debate as to whether this debt level is “sustainable” or “manageable”. Economists might point you to debt over 80% as unsustainable, Deputy Stephen Donnelly oftentimes refers to Harvard research which shows that only one country in history emerged from such a level of debt without default, and that was Britain during the Industrial Revolution. On the other hand, others point us to the fact that Ireland had a similar level of debt in the 1980s which we repaid without default and which didn’t stop the development of the Celtic Tiger in the 1990s. The position on here is that managing this debt will have such a negative impact on Irish society, our health, education and security that it is unmanageable. That’s a view, others will have different views. But with this view in mind, our debt level must be cut and the obvious candidate for cutting is the residual bank debt – the €28bn of promissory notes and to a much more limited extent now, the bondholders. A negotiation to cut this debt looks like this “I will pay you 20c in the euro on the bonds and promissory notes and if you don’t accept that, then I will pay you zero”. At this stage, no-one in Ireland should believe that fairness or a 120% debt:GDP will convince our partners in Europe that they should give Ireland debt relief. After all, what Irish person is losing sleep over a man who kills himself in front of the Greek parliament leaving behind a suicide note which says he doesn’t want to live eking a life from foraging from rubbish bins, and what Irish person is losing sleep over Greek debt which is worse than our own? So ask yourself this question – will a “no” vote improve our chances of a renegotiation of our debt, damage our chances or leave our chances the same? The position on here is that a “no” vote will improve our chances by signalling that Ireland will be inconvenient and un-European and a “no” vote in a referendum one day may become a unilateral disowning of promissory notes the next. Unless Ireland adopts a stance which at least makes clear the threat of default then the view on here is we will get no-where. And as for the ECB and the withdrawal of its support, please, at this stage the ECB is lending about 3% of its balance sheet to Ireland, pretty much in line with our economic proportions in Europe– gone are the days of unprecedented assistance when our banks received 25% of all ECB lending.
Custom, homemade birthday cakes are a tradition in our family. Every year my kids tell me what kind of cake they want.....they have asked for a variety of characters and scenarios, including;
Both family and friends have been gathering here on a regular basis lately to play Settlers of Catan. They have progressed to a level that has surpassed my current abilities to understand what in the hell they are doing now that they are playing several of the expansion games at the same time. Makes for some fun evenings all around though!
AUGUST 1998
But there was no Call Ahead Seating and no Fastpass for this line. I don’t remember how long we actually waited, but it was a pretty significant amount of time. Long enough for all of us to be starving by the time we were finally seated. We hit the buffet and loaded up in record time and just as we did, the characters started their parade.
This is another topic I could bla-bla on for days, really. But when Meph was at our peak – back in 95-96, we were having the time of our lives. When you’re in it, it’s tough to keep a handle on it, to keep perspective, but really, having been a veteran of grueling tours with less popular bands, I don’t think we realized collectively how lucky we really were. The antipathy and anger people develop when they live on top of each other is a luxury that you don’t appreciate til you don’t have it anymore.
in the forests of Sweden when he was only twelve.
"In the Distance"
I really like what these websites have to offer when it comes to tips for gingers because it’s true to who we are and typically rules I abide by. I think they both give great advice for letting out our true beauty rather than hiding our gingerness. Well, embrace it now redheads of the world because we’re a rare breed and if we change, who are people supposed to make fun of? ;)
something to hold your latest crafty purchase.......
I hope you are having a marvelous day. :) Thanks for surviving through my marathon of maternity pictures!
You may notice that the new images are now part of a set, that's right our Digis now come with matching sentiments! You have asked for sentiments that would coordinate with our images and we have heard you! Now let's check out the fabulous samples our design team has cooked up to share with all of you!
Q.: Some writers take great inspiration from music while they are writing. Do you listen to music while you’re writing? If so, what artists/bands do you like to listen to while you write?
as Honest men.”
and for something like a second
Still, it smelled wonderful walking home, even once we'd left the softly dripping earthiness that is our tiny forest. And when we stopped outside our house, Emi caught something passing overhead out of the corner of her eye: bats! We figure they're probably nesting in the neighbors tree again. We stood and watched them for a while as they swooped back and forth over our heads, catching bugs, jagged wings outlined against what little light was left in the sky. And I couldn't help but smile, and dance into the house in happiness to tell my mother, whom I knew would be interested.
And we’re not leaving.
my lips a drum, a drawstring purse,
This is one baking book I cannot wait to start trying out.
How about you? Are there are a few songs that you know every word to? Those you sing in the shower or while driving in your car?
…all the Busy
When I got the call that Mom was near the end of her life and I needed to go home, I hung up the phone and sat on my couch. I suddenly was concerned…what if those people were right…what if Mom wasn’t going to heaven? I remember praying in my thoughts to God, and asking, “Is she alright with you, God?” I heard a very clear answer in my mind telling me “Yes.” It was in fact so clear of a voice that I looked up and asked out loud, “Are you sure?” I had this sense as if God was chuckling at me, as He responded, “Yes, I’m sure.”
It could be argued that many young homosexuals are not taking their lives so much due to 'anti-gay bullying', but because they feel pressured to join in the (hedonistic) homosexual lifestyle - a depressing prospect for anyone, let alone someone who may be sensitive or shy.
I have visited some Norwegian airports during the last few weeks. I am not satisfied of the draught beer selection I have seen. The restaurants and bars are tied to the Ringnes brewery group in beverages. This means that Ringnes pale lager is found on tap more or less everywhere. In addition to Ringnes, you will often find Carlsberg pale lager, Kilkenny and Guinness and here and there a local pale lager from the Ringnes sortiment or a seasonal special.
OK, I do care a little bit, but only to this extent: WoTC have the clout to affect the whole roleplaying world. I want 5e to succeed because I want the population of roleplayers to grow. However, I've been too turned off by the bloated number-cruncher that 3e turned into, and the pseudo-MMORPG that 4e proved to be, to be all that bothered about WoTC's products for my own use.
Colleen was a cook by necessity. A mother of four with nary a reliable man in her life, she had plenty of mouths to feed, including her parents, who she took in during their later years, as well as cousins and uncles and neighbors and anybody who needed a place to stay and a home-cooked meal.
Just to qualify the rules for submission: we are looking for UNPUBLISHED stories by UNPUBLISHED writers. If your stories have been posted on a Facebook page, blog or forum post you MAY enter it for the New Rose Prize. If your stories have been published in a magazine, book, compilation or any other printed matter then they DO NOT qualify for this prize. The New Rose Prize is looking for writers who have previously not been published - as a way of giving an opportunity to those who have not seen their work in print. Hope that clarifies things - and sorry for any confusion!
fresh ground black pepper to taste
concernin questions arty
And if you’re simply a fan of music in general, do you think there’s a good chance older and younger musicians could make some good music by playing together?
Obviously this list isn't exhaustive, but hopefully it helps you get your creative juices flowing! Go ahead and comment with more gift ideas too! Can always use some nifty new ones. I still have the other half of my Christmas shopping to do :) Oh, and for a lot of kid-related gift ideas, click on our "gift ideas" link on the sidebar under the "We're Organized" heading!
I want to make sure we don't ever get too busy that we can't be thankful for the days we have.
Friday, February 2nd–I went to see “The Painted Veil.”
Power and Beauty– starring Natasha Henstridge as Judith Campbell Exner, Kevin
Next on the How To Act Like A Grown-Up list: learning to return the library books on time. Did you know there's not a limit to how high your fine will go? Honestly, I'm better off just going to Barnes and Noble.
I set up the machine with the lower rolling bed which means the machine will only travel east and west...since I raised the feed dogs and added the walking foot, the machine chugs it's own way across the quilt. So cool!!! The only drawback is it only chugs one direction, so every row is made while traveling east. I have to stop at the end of each row, clip threads, and begin the next row back at the beginning. I also have to advance the quilt at the beginning of each row, but it sure beats wrestling the fabric not the machine without a frame.
Got to spend some quality time with some of my favorite people this past weekend--my friends Josh, Michelle, and their daughter Ruby who were visiting from Portland, OR. We ate vegan treats and swam in the river. The Geej and Ruby played and had a blast. It was wonderful.
JC
So there you go. Go split some sweet potato gumbo or shrimp and grits with a friend, or just grab the black-eyed pea chili and cornbread for yourself. Then bring some to me. I'll have the pecan pie waiting.
With its strongest record to date just about to be released, the band has big hopes of breaking into the mainsteam with their album and their soon-to-be-announced tour.
I settled on a red corduroy one that had a hood to it. It looked real warm, and he would like that. "Is this a Christmas present for someone?" the lady behind the counter asked kindly, as I laid my ten dollars down. "Yes,"I replied shyly. "It's ... for Bobby." The nice lady smiled at me. I didn't get any change, but she put the coat in a bag and wished me a Merry Christmas.
Meanwhile, massive anti-Internet and data sharing laws, such as SOPA, paid for by the oligarchs of the media to their bought and paid for government, are on the verge of shutting any and all communication down. Barrack Obama has even been fighting for an Internet kill switch to be placed in his hands, to shut everything down in cases of emergency, a term that never seems to get many adjectives or other descriptive words, that is, no boundaries defining it.
Sandra was a good friend of the ringmaster’s wife and wanted to tell her everything. Aware of the distress that this would cause Cécile, I advised her to adopt a more subtle strategy.
When the 911 Commission went out of its way to define terrorism as not just any generic terrorism, but specifically as “Islamist,” this pejorative label, despite the banal niceties of “Islam being a religion of peace,” sent a chilling message to Muslims worldwide that terrorism is a hallmark or prerogative of Islam, or that when committed by other groups it is in some way mitigated by intrinsic extenuating circumstances. It is ironic that Muslims have the greatest vested interest in eradicating terrorism.
Mirrored 7.4g compact. This foundation is good for those who like to use their product wet or dry. It comes with a puff to use dry for a medium coverage or use wet for a much fuller cover.
Per Bernard Goldberg on Fox News, the Business and Media Institute found several important differences between then and now:
I am once again pushing the clock to get my daily post up. I decided to make Charles a little apple crisp. It smells really good but it has some issues. I did find one flaw as it baked; I needed a bit more butter so I added a tablespoon of butter cut into little pats in the last 5 minutes to help the “crisp” crisp. I like the version without oatmeal; that’s how mom always made it. I must find her recipe and post it soon; I just can’t remember where it is!
- Ranger Neil Martin notes additional carvings being added afterwards
This week in the life of Christ demonstrates the passion and commitment of Christ to fulfill all that the Father has set before him. This week made public to the world that which had been the convictions of Jesus followers since the beginning of His ministry. It crystallized and communicated to all who had ears to hear – that Jesus, the Chosen Messiah would not establish His Kingdom in this world as some had hoped, rather his Kingdom would be ushered in through his very death and resurrection as he had foretold. While this public demonstration of his Passion had profound effects on the world, at the same time it had deeply personal implications and impacts.
The only time I feel free is when I live as I am. All that I am. Last year when we did this love month I really felt I came alive. So I’m really thrilled to be doing it again. To have a reason to go beyond my comfort zones and shower love on people…try my best to be nice to the people I love…not take the piss too much, which is basically my way of showing I care, whilst covering up how much I care at the same time. (Last year when doing this some of my brothers from other mothers were teasing me about not being able to croak out I loved them very sufficiently and I got play fighting with one of them. To me, that’s showing love, which of course my friends found hysterical. So basically, if I punch you, or tell you you’re an idiot, it pretty much means I like you. I’m not a secret tomb boy. Not at all. Anyone wanna go racing cars??? Climb a mountain? Sailing? Play, play, play, play?)
The cheapie workbench I've been using for two decades came equipped with board supports, so I dropped two of them into the dog holes on my benchtop, on either side of my workpiece. Then, I placed one thick wedge in between a peg and the board.
with the Simorgh Women’s Collective
And up and down the people go,
Oh , and it gave us a legit reason to stay out late.
This is a band that while I was living in S.F. I think many of us took for granted, because they played shows in the Bay Area all the time. I saw these guys a lot, seemed like they were on every show. Sometimes I wasn't even paying attention to them. They always sorta reminded me of a younger, poor mans Adolescents. I bought the 12" before actually ever seeing them. The reason I bought it was because I noticed there was a song titled "fight back". I was pretty sure this must be a cover of the Discharge song with the same name. Nope, not even close. I was pretty closed minded at this point in my life, and really just wanted loud and fast, so this 12" sorta let me down when i plunked the needle down on the platter. It took me years to rediscover this. Its great.. melodic, and catchy as fuck punk rock. Pretty sure these guys were from San Jose(although the addy on the back jacket is from somewhere else). It was produced by someone from the Faction(not Steve C). Enjoy.
Now, I'm going to be honest. I did't entirely know what a truffle is. I knew that they use pigs to hunt them down in the woods, and according to someone on the Food Network, apparently they've started using dogs to hunt them too. Mainly because the pigs eat them once they find them. But who could blame a pig for doing that? I'd do it. Does that make me a pig? Don't answer that. So anyway, I did a quick wikipedia search on truffles and apparently they're a "fungal fruiting body." The accompanying photos didn't make truffles look particularly appetizing, so instead I've pictured toddler-sized mushrooms running running through the forrest with fruit growing off their bodies, trying to escape a herd of swine.
The first response I received was from Torquay United striker Rene Howe.
and so
I was super busy last week completing a charm swap I organized and I didn't get to participate in the color challenge. I promise I will be back on my game this week! =)
For there is one Person of the Father, another of the Son, and another of the Holy Ghost.
So, I know the look he will want.
A very close friend of mine asked if I could make an Anniversary card for mutual friends of ours. I wanted to keep the design clean and simple. So I just used embossing folders, a few pretty embellies and my Martha Stewart border punch available from Dies To Die For
Actions happened , deeds were done, but there was no doer.
Falcon-Lang's find was a collection of 314 slides of specimens gathered by Darwin and other members of his inner circle, including John Hooker, a botanist and dear friend of Darwin, and Rev. John Henslow, Darwin's mentor at Cambridge, whose daughter later married Hooker, include 40million-year-old plants from a remote island off the coast of Chile. Another shows a towering tree-sized fungus which covered the Earth 400million years ago when the climate was so hot there was no ice even at the Poles.
Reader Tom C. sent along some of his owl photos which arrived too late for our recent OwlFest. But they’re lovely pictures, so I’ll post herewith his snaps of Aseo flammeus and his captions (click to enlarge).
Chicken coop later in construction. With the exception of a couple of 2x4's and a few sheets of OSB for the floor and ceiling, it has all been repourposed materials. It's amazing what you can find in other people's trash heaps.
"Do I want to know what finish time you put on that pace band?" I asked. I knew it was sub-2 but I didn't know exactly what it was.
My boss required this.
“Research to date has shown that the concentration of a variety of pharmaceuticals found in run-off from biosolids-treated fields is significantly lower than levels that would cause any known health or environmental effects,” he said.
If you’re trying to lose weight… take baby steps. Start by changing one meal a day to a healthy one. Pick one small snack a day if the meal thing is too big of a first step.
Eyes: Izzie’s – Natural MESH Eyes
Here's how to order:
Chicago makes baseball easy, at least on the South Side, as the Red Line stops a few hundred yards from the park. We were seated four rows back, on the first base line in right field. The stadium is built so that this meant we were virtually at field level with a great view. It was wet. And cold. Tarps were down over the infield and their removal was greeted with a roar of approval. Maybe this wouldn't be so bad! And just as the game began, it rained. Not for long, though, just enough to give everyone a good soaking in preparation for blasts of really cold air. For the most part, the rain held off for nine innings but the cold and the wind never did. We stuck it out, though, along with the thousands of happy locals whose team won this game, along with the previous two games in the series. Me, not so happy with the result, but very pleased we'd taken our chances.
by Fran Manushkin
Racked: 02-05-2008
As the space program is being ramped up to a scale never before seen in history (it's my belief that Obama could very well have been installed to transform America from an arms-based economy to a space-based one), I think everyone should at least familiarize themselves with Hoagland's work, which long predates us all in Synchromysticland.
28 oz can/jar spaghetti sauce
12th - first round of declutter-washing. (No, they aren't really baby clothes that have been languishing in the loft for 6 years.....)
Trainer: Stuart Crawford IRE Breeder: Donal Murphy Jockey: Robert Power
Time of Ja’s life: unknown
Ashley De La Rosa is first up from Team Xtina and she sang “You and I” by Lady Gaga and when she started I was confused because she was singing in a different accent and she was very nervous. Adam said it wasn’t his favorite and Blake said based on her past performances he would definitely go with her. So I guess that means tonight she didn’t come off as confident.
All supplies are Stampin' Up! unless otherwise noted.
It’s one thing to not get what we want. But it’s harder when we get the exact opposite of what we want. Even in that case we should thank God and just go on. That’s what gives us inner substance and strength. Even an athlete gets strong through the process of resistance. Yes, if you want to actually gain strength, the more the resistance, the more you can gain. When you lift weights, you are resisting the laws of gravity. The weight is pushing down and you are pushing up and then you become strong while dealing with the resistance. If you say, ‘It’s too heavy, just forget it. I will lie down, eat potato chips and watch television,’ you will never become strong. Similarly, study is all about resistance. The mind wants to think about the girl next to you or something like that, but you have to just resist. ‘I have to just resist and focus on this mathematical equation.’ That’s how you become intelligent, through resistance. So in spiritual life there is much resistance coming from both within and without, and through that we become powerful. We become empowered to the degree we are willing to face that resistance and grow with it.
And the worries have only continued to fester, like the gonorrhea in the Gowanus.
That last story is particularly interesting if it can be verified. It's worth noting that the UFO and abduction wave-- whatever you personally make of it-- coincided with the nuclear anxiety of the Cold War, as well as Three Mile Island and Chernobyl. It's worth noting that abductees often report lectures on nuclear power and weapons by their captors, whatever you personally make of the stories themselves.
Got that disco-emo boyz
“USC has its policies,” Kumamoto said, “but policies can be reviewed.”
Since I've already exposed myself to be a porn snob, I might as well continue in that vein by declaring Catherine Ringer's performance way too awesome to be wasted in a film like this. It doesn't take long to realize that Catherine is immensely talented, as even the sight of her standing motionless in a window manages to convey a surprising of amount of depth. The audience is no doubt thinking to themselves, "Who is this woman, and why does she fascinate me so much?" Of course, nowadays, this kind of emotional breadth is no longer welcome in the realm of modern day erotica. But let's not dwell of the differences between the arty smut of the past and the crude, dehumanizing porn of the present, let's get back to extolling the many virtues of Catherine Ringer–who is credited here as "Lolita Da Nova."
Issue #30 has been delayed in part because I'm preparing some cartoons for submission to a comics publication of note. This has put me on the computer much more than usual, which is the exact opposite of my goal in life. Much of the work of OPE takes place offline, disengaged from the collective, where I must generate my own thoughts using my mind. But the computer causes my brain to reorganize in undesirable ways.
will be a mass dissemination of Truth following mass declaokings.
3. The Decaf Version
As time progressed, it seemed that many of the soldiers were suffering from other ailments as well. Rumors had spread that four or five men had died exhibiting symptoms of Tuberculosis. Fear was rampant. Morale was non-existent. The men trudged on because they knew of nothing else to do.
As covered by Tim Winship from smartertravel, American announced its double EQM deal in early September, and was soon followed by United and Continental. All three deals require pre-registration and run until December 15, 2009. Keep an eye out for other airlines that may eventually take part in this competition.
The back of the bottle says:
(I’m pretty sure I got this recipe from my mom, years ago. It is a great family favorite!)
Across the room from my painting desk and computer is a shelving unit that houses, among other things, a television, photos, sunglasses, readers, necklaces, items the girls made in school, etc.
#43
it was much a friend of small businesses everywhere, but i'm happy to say that i'm super pleased with one of picnik's suggested photo editing & graphic designing replacements:*PicMonkey.com*
According to the registrant, the applicant did not show sufficiently a serious risk for an average consumer, who is deemed to be reasonably well informed, reasonably observant and circumspect. In other words the registrant asserts: people know that smoking is bad for your health, all smoking. This is an important point, because deception has two parties, the deceiver and the one that is or is not susceptible for the deception.
All Seasons Place
Some people say that I am going insane, but I know that they are wrong, I’ve been there for a long time. - Rob Person
You can have all the "stuff" in the world and still not have peace. But you can also be destitute and in abject poverty, but still have Christ's peace inside. It's not a matter of whether your cup is half empty or half full--it's a matter of Who is filling your cup! If Christ is not the one who is giving you strength and peace, then you don't have strength and peace--you have an imposter. But if He is the one filling you from the inside out, who or what in this world can stop it or take it away from you?
These claims fall way short in the face of IM & sister site Palingates efforts to keep crucial Intel from their readership…
Next you will find out quickly it’s ok to possibly be wrong about an opinion as long as you can see it and
“I do not.”
The streets are deserted, there’s nobody there
The Toronto Sun is reporting that the barley crop in Western Canada is poor again this year. As the quality of the barley determines whether it becomes malting barley or feed barley, it is still unclear how much will end up in malters. Thus, once again, there are supply conditions that might make the cost of producing beer increase.
To top it off, I enjoyed this single bottle of Nogne O Winter Ale relaxing in the backyard while the grandkids cavorted through piles of freshly raked leaves. I may never know perfect, but I'm up to my eyeballs in good enough. Thank heaven.
The 30-year-old How I Met Your Mother actress wore an off-the-shoulder floral-print chiffon Dolce & Gabbana evening gown featuring a draped neckline and light ruffles which cascade around the skirt. The floor length dress was accessorized with Amrapali earrings, an oversize magenta leather clutch and a wavy updo hairstyle.
After the previous night’s events, Leslie must do major damage control and stages a press conference to apologize. After Derek calls her a bitch again, she takes back her apology and says that he was drunk, aggressive, and used her second-least favourite term for women. Her campaign is still moving forward and her boyfriend might beat you up.
Pines touched and healed by fire.
For further history see the links above to historycommons.org or go to book cited, from 1994, A Brief History of the Caribbean: From the Arawak and the Carib to the Present by Jan Rogozinski.
And then hound again, and cat, a white cat and black cat, and also a red striped cat with shiny claws and sneaky eyes.
It was a perfect day for it. The weather was clear and warm without being hot, a light cool breeze, and everything freshly clean and vibrant from last night’s rain. He parked on the street at the edge of the park, and we walked barefoot in the long, spring grass. He found us a good spot under a tree next to the playground, we ditched our stuff and headed over to the swings. He pushed me as high as I’d ever gone on those swings, high enough to where the tension goes out of the chains when you stop at the top and you sort of fall back down with a quick jerk and a swoosh at the bottom. He chased me around the jungle gym and then up the slide backwards. It was the most I’d seen him laugh in a very long time. It was good to see the “old Dave” back for a while.
If you would like a chance to win an signed copy of Segreto Finishes, leave a comment below telling us what most interested you about our interview with Leslie. She's a real DIY'er at heart and there's much to learn from her story!
Elochukwu for the purpose of
Stopped again in Bakersfield spent the night, and then headed home with Aunt Trula. She had a great visit with her daughter while we were enjoying our "Whirlwind" week. Didn't open a computer, and it was really a nice break. It snowed on the I-5 over the "Grapevine" and they closed the hwy for 4 hours on Monday, but when we left Tuesday morning the roads were open and this was a treat to drive through and see the mountains covered with snow.
8. How long can you hold your breath?
was just a sucker for being happy,
Peace won't be all I dreamed of.
How can you motivate someone else till you first motivate yourself?
On the quay is the Green Quay Discovery Centre. Formerly, Marriot's Warehouse, it is an old Tudor Warehouse built in about the 1580s. It was used to store corn from visiting ships but is now a wildlife centre specialising in life on The Wash.
Checkout her editorial with the magazine below:
I think they turned out pretty well, don't you? The entire project took me less than an hour for all three. Best of all, they really matched nicely with the pajama pants. The men liked the sayings I surprised them with and they liked the colors of the shirts...win/win all around.
13) Is There a Place for Creative Christians? In community that is caring and healthy, an artist brings not only beauty and inspiration but also powerful observational skills and spiritual awareness.
It fitted the Feast: 'twas a symbol,
Lakoff says it’s “a good thing” that Occupy isn’t “making specific policy demands”. He argues that Occupy is about a shift in “moral focus”, and that, “If the movement is to frame itself, it should be on the basis of its moral focus, not a particular agenda or list of policy demands.”
One can game-plan a smart player by taking away the three steps ahead possibilities, the passing lanes can be shortened and elongated at will, but smart players – and this sounds counter-productive or intuitive – when given the full control to coach and play as you go (absolutely just rationalizing Paul listening and offering his own take on play-call with Del Negro) can and will excel at open-space, no end in sight. With so many timeouts and interruptions and coaches wanting to leave their bow and arrow on-site and off, it’s refreshing to think about a player coaching his team as he goes, true improvisation and stream-of-consciousness. And smart players can make improv and tiny little change-of-plans seem tick-tock meticulous. Enter Chris Paul. Can’t blame him when his eyes roll back. I’d rather he run the projector.
Like I said, though, just writing everything down now, and making sure he doesn’t talk to me unless absolutely necessary.
Ummm...I just left one small detail out of my magnificent plan.....the gate keys. Yep...I'm responsible for the lives of my children and my dog and I left the gate keys in the house. So, we just prayed and stood outside and watched the houses rock back and forth until it stopped. Praise the Lord we didn't need to go all the way out into the street. The maid next door was outside also and she was terrified. Poor thing:(
Lining the walls of this forlorn structure is an impressive artifact from Coney Island's history, in the form of dozens of hand painted murals. Though badly deteriorated, there are many colorful scenes remaining. Presented almost as panels in a comic book, these are portraits of a different Coney Island era, long past. Strip poker, naked hunting, shotgun weddings, Sasquatch, moonshine, skeeball, mermaids and cartoonish gun violence. This is Coney Island's lost soul, a forgotten and crumbling old arcade full of cat piss, ruinous decay and dark carnival whimsy.
In the old traditional days women who had been beaten and their arms broken were forced to return to their parents on the same day with gifts for their husbands. That was true love anchored on forgiveness. There were no grudges, hardly any divorce. Wife beating in certain communities in Kenya remains a cultural love practice that is still highly valued and revered for its romantic nature.
● Alternate Opening
* You say that a small farmers' market doesn't exist in Santa Monica? Head to Virginia Avenue Park Saturday mornings, and pick up a loaf of wonderful hazelnut cranberry bread, as well as your basic necessities. I'm also a fan of this market, because while Gloria's stand sells quality produce for half the price, there's also a stand run by Asian-American farmers, so I can pick up the veggies of my childhood (whose names I don't know in English)!
I fit knitting into my life one row at a time. It often takes weeks to complete a small project. That’s sort of how I’m feeling about my novel right now. I’m aiming to do a little novel work every day. A few new sentences, some edits, or even reading James Wood’s HOW FICTION WORKS all count. It feels great to be writing consistently again, even though it’s slow and the luxurious 2-hour blocks are scarce. I could certainly use more time, but I’ll take what I can get and do my best to use it wisely.
she'll unravel
whose origins are from of old,
The strength of a father's arm and hands carries that lovely burden with such ease, the baby feels totally relaxed, her head cupped in this big warm hand with great tenderness.
Still hanging in there. Feeling pretty good. Seems this new roller coaster gets the best of me at times but I'm getting the hang of it.
I wanted to thank all you lovely ladies who have taken the time to leave such gorgeous comments on my blog throughout the year and for inspiring me with all your amazing creations. Every time I go visiting I am truly blown away with all the fabulous talent and artistry and I can't wait to see what fantastic new creations 2012 will bring. Lots of love.
” I
The poor old lad probably had no idea that he would wind up in the mortuary tonight and the clothes on his back would end up on the floor next to me as I reduce the drama of his death to a few keystrokes while drinking black coffee out of a Judge Dredd mug.
I would say this fits a bout a 21-22 inch head.
Remember to post your projects using Inlinkz no later than 12:00 noon Central time on Friday, November 25, 2011. We will announce the winner of the stamp set and the new Top Mouse Award winners when the new sketch challenge is posted on Saturday, November 26th. Please use a direct link to your project and feel free to enter as many times as you like!
was Margaret Thatcher's Secretary of State for Wales until he stepped down in 1987, soon becoming Lord Crickhowell, hence the original name of the building in today's story. But before leaving the Commons Edwards set up the Cardiff Bay Development Corporation, and installed his crony, Geoffrey Inkin, to run it. Soon after leaving Parliament Edwards / Crickhowell took over the helm of ABP.
4-What is the trait you most deplore in yourself?
Best Character: Rory. I have really warmed too him.
onto Pinterest...
becomes a man.
1 dappled
With summer around the corner and a container of grape tomatoes and a bunch of fresh basil beckoning me, I decided take my favorite summertime appetizer and convert it into a salad.
"........................They do something else. Roland Barthes described in his 1980 book Camera Lucida going through his mother's photographs shortly after her death, and finding her portrait taken before he was born. "I could read my own non-existence in the clothes my mother had worn before I could remember her," Barthes wrote. I read something spookier in those two photographs – my own improbable existence. In these images, I haunt a time and a place I find it hard to imagine belonging to but which I very certainly did................."
and so she couldn't come Home,
While exploring Arizona further south and east, I discovered more breathtakingly diverse scenery! The view in this photo is of Texas Canyon, so named because of all the Texans who settled this particular area.
I think the title and cover work so well together on this one. The title is so evocative, and it's such a perfect fit for the novel.
Yes, even with graph paper I can’t draw a straight line! You get the general idea.
On the way were many stalls with orange t-shirts where Myrte and I looked for a suitable purchase. Unfortunately none were that great and so we remained less orange than most other people. We didn’t know where to go so we just walked around where the crowds were. The scene is like how Rhythms of the World used to be (a music festival in the town over from me). Where there are many stages set up all over town and you can just wonder between them, listen to the music and enjoy a beverage. With the added bonus of looking out for a bargain. However with the differences that the music being played not being varied, they were all DJs, and the few grassy parts we found were not near a stage. Apparently they had changed it this year as Radio 538 used to do a festival on Museumplein, but now they had decided to split up all the venues more. This didn’t really bother me I was still really enjoying myself.
When I became pregnant with Geekygirl in San Francisco, I sought the care of a hospital midwife rather than the more typical obstetrician, since midwife care is more usual in the UK where I'm from. I learned from friends who had given birth about the value of having the support of a doula during labor, so I hired the amazing Germaine Reidy, who now works in Ireland. If anyone reading this is planning on having a baby in Ireland, check her out! The picture on her site here is of me taking her infant massage class with Geekybaby.
The “Free Anwar 901″ campaign is seen as a form of provocation on the sodomy case involving the Parti Keadilan Rakyat (PKR) advisor.
Vines grow towards light by elongating their stems and attaching themselves to whatever support is available.
OMG I can’t believe how stupid this guy is! The Lich King’s horse is INVINCIBLE NOT INVISIBLE YOU STUPID IDIOT! ALSO YOU’RE STUPID!! HAHAHAHAHAHA!!! How dumb do you have to be to not know words.
Ashley is this crazy smart kid with a huge heart that unfortunatly has been hurt alot, but the anger she has against all of us is crazy and scary...my biggest fear is when she graduates next year she will leave and never come back. If I did something wrong I could understand, if I beat her or hurt her or did anything to her, then this anger would be right,but I dont. She complains we dont spend alot of time togather...we dont. she never wants to be around me, and when I talk to her no matter what I say she walks off and shuts her door leaving me feeling so lost. I dont blame her for her feelings, because we all must have done something, I just dont understand what yet.
Asafoetida - 2 or 3 sprnkles
As she gulped down her own glass of milk, Susan wondered what time it was. There was a big wooden clock on the mantelpiece, she liked its loud ticking, but the numbers were written in Roman, and even though she knew she should still be able to tell the time, just from the position of them, the harder she stared, the more complicated it seemed.
Holidays:
Bafana Bafana 2 (video) – Producer
3. Pray and ask God to help you in the battle — God is the One person the devil does not want to see on your side of the battlefield
Where things are getting complicated is with our multiple of online personas.
We are proud to recommend this incredible conference! We are attending, participating as a vendor & we are helping "host" this conference in Nashville! I personally know someone that attended this conference last year and was life changing for her and her business. This conference is very affordable & is in 20 different cities.
I think that I'm lucky that I have my health---I'm lucky that everyone who chooses to read by blog, takes the time to see what I think----I'm lucky that I have "met" some wonderful people on the Web.
My goal in doing all this? Besides the obvious - my general health - I hope to stay actively involved in my kids' lives... and someday I want to be fully involved with my grandchildren if God gives them to me. I am someone who will not be a "young" grandma (at least I better not be too young!) because I had my children in my 30's. In fact, I was 37 when Chloe was born so even if she has her first baby as early as 25 I will be 62 already. If I can help it, I don't want to be the grandma who sits in the wheelchair and watches on the sidelines....I want to be on the floor playing with them and going on trips with them and chasing them around the yard!
He hasn't seen it yet (so Dad, if you're reading, watch out for the postie) and I hope he likes it. Because I was thinking about him with every stitch I made, and as a result, for once I didn't swear at the sewing machine during the process.
Kind of in me.
You'd probably get a nickname out of it. "Filling the Printer" would become a euphemism for going to lunch or making a phone call or, god forbid, something else.
5. japanese gum- her space holiday
"Good Enuff" isn't just for users, it enables us marketers to shoot more ideas fast(er), cheap(er) instead of rolling all our energies into a single overly produced "perfect" idea that just may fail. So fail fast(er). And fail cheap(er).
Let no Nigerian, especially Christian, be fooled into believing that Boko Haram does not spares anybody. Their attacks against their Muslim fellows are either accidental or against those they deem as working against their agenda, but their main targets are Christians and their places of worship. Ponder over this reality: When had the sect invaded a Friday Muslim Prayer and throw explosives and open fire on Muslims worshippers? No record of such.
f) otherwise bribe/cheat/steal. This is a lawless society.
Exterior Home Designs, External components of your home is as important as inside. When I saw you, it’s the first thing they notice is part of the exterior. The majority of home owners, who are out more information about what’s going on inside one of the most interest is concerned. Since there are many beautiful things can be done from the actual appearance of your home, so the interest is very frustrating.
Where nevermore the rose of sunset pales,
“The Blue Sands” as they perform an exclusive show in Nottinghamshire on November 2nd 2011.
Theda Perdue wrote a history of Cherokee Women: Gender and Culture Change, 1700-1835, probably the best history book I've ever read. Aong with the other women of my face-to-face book club, I met her when she spoke at the University of Tennessee at Chattanooga on the same night we sat around a table to discuss her book.
My life is an early spring snow
Mr Page was invited to the event by its organisers, the Frampton Court Estate, to urge people to attend the Liberty and Livelihood March in London.
I mean, look, it’s an awful movie in a traditional sense, but it’s not an awful Chuck Norris movie, and it’s the film that inspired Norris to make Walker, Texas Ranger, so we owe/”owe” it that.
Paper accounts for 25% of landfill waste (and one third of municipal landfill waste).
to this add Rice flour water roux , mix them well together.
As I walked out of the second session I was pulled into an American Heart Association class on infant CPR. Of course my kids are no longer infants but the AHA folks were quite insistent and I figured, "my kids aren't the only ones I might need to learn CPR for," so I went in to check it out. They gave each of us an Infant CPR Anytime Personal Learning Program, which is a boxed kit containing reading materials, an instructional DVD, and an inflatable infant CPR doll. The idea is that you can buy one of these kits and learn basic CPR at home, which I think is brilliant. Since Sweet Pea was born I have wanted Slipshod and I to take a CPR class but we have never gotten around to it because the courses are day-long deals. Tomorrow the American Heart Association is doing an adult/child CPR class during one of the breaks and I really want to take that one, since it is relevant to the ages of my children. And adults. The ages of the people I'm around on a regular basis.
19And Joshua said to the people, You are not able to be the servants of the Lord, for he is a holy God, a God who will not let his honour be given to another: he will have no mercy on your wrongdoing or your sins.
And while these poems offer an interesting glimpse into Cohen’s life as a monk, the only poems for me are those of actual longing which read like existential odes to love, desire and loneliness suggesting that despite his pursuit of inner harmony and cosmic tranquillity, the once infamous ladies’ man hasn’t quite mastered how to transcend his “lawless heart” and mortal carnality. In many of these poems Cohen finds himself recollecting his romantic feats, but more often defeats, thus the overall tone is frequently one of rueful melancholy. Some of Cohen’s best works of this nature are the ballads of simple quatrains that evoke the atmospheric expediency and balance of the poet’s desire and self-deprecation: “What can I do/with this love of mine/with this hairy knob/with this poison wine/Who shall I take/to the edge of despair/with my knee on her heart/ and my lips on her hair.”
The trees, like serafin, and echoing hills,
Before I sign off I must ask, again, if anyone has any better ideas for recording a diary suitable for use in a DLA renewal application. If you do then please let me know asap. Thanking you in advance.
There are so many emotions to deal with all at the same time. All of the emotions that come with a break up. And there are some major emotions and fears that come with being on my own. The point of me moving 2 1/2 years ago was to be on my own and things happened and it didn't work out like I planned. I was prepared then. I had planned for it. I had mentally gotten myself ready. Now? I'm not sure.
Felt so light…
by the old distillery,
4. Combine all dressing ingredients in a bullet-style blender. Pulse until garlic is incorporated and dressing appears creamy. Set aside.
The images themselves erupt with energy and are thoughtfully combined although, while some get detailed air-date and episode-number credits, others are tagged vaguely, such as “Soul Train dancers circa 1973 to 1976.” Kool and the Gang in ’74 is next to Cameo in ’85; Jeffrey Osborne’s bedazzled 1980 outfit is next to Elton John’s bedazzled 1975 outfit. The lone black-and-white image is of Chaka Khan, on episode 128, the day after Valentine’s Day, 1975.
The Third regiment was formed in September, 1811. It participated in the invasion of Russia as part of Oudinot's 2nd Corps, and were brigaded with the Swiss regiments. They fought well at the first and 2nd battles of Polotsk, and the crossing of the Beresina. Remnants of the regiment served in garrison duty in 1813.
Fourth, I spent the last hour at work on a conference call with a teammate and 2 attorneys going over each paragraph of a 22 page contract that we're hoping to enter with a new vendor. We only got to page 5. We resume at 9:30 tomorrow morning.
I had one incrediblely divine appointment on Saturday I have to tell you about because I’m still so excited over it! Part of the training on Saturday was CPR training. As a foster parent you have to have your CPR training renewed every 2 years. So a couple came in the back of the class just for that part of the day.
Mom #2 dusted off the old Rand McNally and we started driving north until we ended up in the deserted hills of New Mexico. We'd never been there before so we spent a lot of time enjoying nature walks with Baby Doggy trying to catch all the road runners and jack rabbits. We also enjoyed looking at the beautiful night sky full of stars that are usually washed out by the light pollution in larger cities. Wow! We didn't know what we'd been missing.
Including this.
When it was time, I packed everything I needed and headed over to California to get me some of that revenge I was owed.
It's crazy exciting. :)
In closing,
I share these stories today to remind you to share yours. Whether good, bad or ugly, God has given us a story to tell, but they all should end the same, He saved me by His grace and for that, I am forever thankful!
If Bob and I visit a 19th century palace of the former Baron Von So-and-So, I find myself wise-cracking, “Hey, check out the crib.” If we’re ushered reverently into some rococo tomb of Great King Austerbottom, I’ll whisper to Bob: So, like, what was up with this guy? And if I see a picture of Prince Charles? I can’t help it. “Hey, look,” I’ll grin. “It’s Chuckie!”
is how it is going to be
Also, this book is the beginning of a series. Though, I’m not quite sure where it’s going. There seem to be some mortality issues in succeeding with Cas’s desires. But my doubts aside I’ll be standing in line for the next installment. I have to see where all this is headed. The ghost killing, the friendships, and the romance. Sooo obvious that this book was just the beginning.
Never give up. How many are going to eternal damnation because the evangelist gave up too soon.
The large Yellow circles represent either individual or clustered homesteads. Notice in the very center of the AO we have a church. Those church bells can be heard from any location in our AO (an added bonus).
Hello everyone! And happy weekend! Hope everyone is doing just fine. :) anyway im going to blog about this upcoming event in June which is next month. Yes! A fashion show again but this time the collection is more on wedding-related! And guess who are the designers? We have Cosry! He did the wedding gown for lisa surihani, umie aida, erra fazira and many more of our local celebrities! Then we have Qudyn, Mimpi Kita, Ammara, Yasalma, Molleque and Peppermint Avenue.
Moving off of Ortega Highway in SJC was at first tragic for me. How could I leave Scotty?!?!? But I made friends with Michelle Pettit and her brother John right off the bat. We were in Mrs. Case's 3rd grade class together and inseperable. I spent so many nights at sleep overs at her house. Her older cousin Pam gave us her old training bras and we thought we were so cool. MTV was born and Michelle's family had cable!!! So we pretended to be the Go Go's or Cindy Lauper and listened to the old AM station the Mighty 690! We ran all over the place in our neighborhood. Playing in the creekbeds catching frogs & turtles, swinging on the old tire swing over the creek, riding our bikes, roller skating, hanging out at Tuesday's Horse Stables, stealing pomegranates from our neighbors tree, playing with Barbies, occasionally washing cars to make a little money.
"...we can look to hunter-gatherer cultures for a certain kind of tolerance and patience – a sense that things take time. Any developments should be pursued only with great caution; changing the environment is a serious matter; the construction of mega-projects is a matter for scepticism. These too are to do with respect – of the land that is going to be devastated by these things and for all the creatures, animal and human, that are at risk."
Medupe talks about incidental jottings found in ancient astronomical books, Arabic vs. local languages, a competing marginalia of myth and science, the two fusing to predict next year's eclipse. "I think this is very exciting," he says, and then grins, looking down at his notes.
Other neighbours must be being kept awake all through the night too. I’d like to post about this on Brockley Central anonymously so I can find other people affected and hope that Environmental Health will take us seriously.
Urban Hobo is about “artful edibles” ….simple great goodness delivered in cool packaging AND funky eclectic art handmade for a gift, yourself or seasonal items.
I recently mentioned how hard it has been for me to find work here in Amsterdam. Most expats probably line up work before they head to their new country. But if you're part of a couple you probably found it's not that easy... As in our case, one of you probably found a job and the other made the move hoping to find a job once you got there.
In the event, it's not 'til midnight, long after most Grenadians have gone to bed, that the statement by Hudson Austin on behalf of the PRA is broadcast. Austin confirms what I heard from the party member yesterday: that Maurice wanted power, that the problems had been hidden from the people for the sake of unity, that he is responsible for the current situation.
Enjoy your week sweet readers!
Bolt is indeed a champion. He has performed at the highest level in back to back championships winning four individual gold medals and four world records in the process. But everyone seemed to forget that Tyson Gay has crossed the line first twice in a major championship himself. One of those races beating a man – Asafa Powell – that was the WR holder and supposed to be able to destroy him. That was considered an “upset” by many as well. But Gay, when faced with tough odds, always seems able to bring his best.
3. Place your paper towel in the tub of vinegar and let it soak while you start on your next towel. (If your only doing one towel, then wait about 5-7 minutes.)
Pooh Font cart- Marker A 1 1/4"-- + 3/4" -- # 1 1/4" -- 1 1 3/4" -- Teacher 1 1/4"
I don’t recall calling it that; But then again I am not a big fan of compromises. But I can say that we are heading for deeper techno waters on the forthcoming album so be prepared.
And now this new pigeon appeared on our balcony, looking very similar to our Mr. Whitecap whom I somehow missed and I was suddenly sure that he, the new one, was an offspring of Mr. Whitecap. He did not have this white cap but he was the same light grey blue barred pigeon, his wing feathers were white and he had at least a few white spots on his head and a really beautiful face and very intense eyes. I just had this feeling…
I won some beer, though, by way of a bet and this grog will be making an appearance when I get round to necking it. It is pong too. Some of it says “CAMRA says this is real ale” on the bottle. Some of it doesn’t. Within the world of work, one from time to time makes the acquaintance of a fellow pisshead. A temporary contractor from Lincoln knocks around the office from time to time and we have been known to have a pint. This is despite his beard, elderly appearance, lack of trendy trainers and fondness for the variable pongy local grog that passes for “real ale” around this part of Oop North. I even took him into the local “craft” beer boozer a few weeks ago to give him the choice of numerous cask and world beers and be in an establishment where beards were the norm rather than unusual. That’s the kind of nice chap I am. I could have dragged him around the tatty pubs near work or his hotel for a skinful of Stella, but I didn’t. I took him on a bus to beer geek heaven. It’s the brotherhood of beer geekery, it transcends cooking lager or even pongy ale enthusiasm.
11:00 – Location Bus
Teddy was almost ready for daddy to take the training wheels off her bike way back in April, before she got sick. She lost her confidence, and didn't have enough energy, so we waited until she plucked up the courage to try again.
“I’m beginning to understand,” I sighed. “Give me some time to think about it. Come back and see me tomorrow afternoon.”
But we arrive safely back in the basement or “subway” as Eaton’s calls it. I know that I deserve the soft white ice cream whirled into a cone sold at a stand near the underground walk to the main Eaton’s Store. I also deserve the hot dog sold there.
like restless women grasping at baubles
The sunspot is so ginormous that it’s possible to view with home telescopes – though experts warn that these must be fitted with sun filters to prevent permanent eye damage.
A highlight of the event will be a performance by Zia Aziz, the whirling Sufi dancer from Turkey who performs a truly hypnotic dance experience and adds a world class and international dimension to the programme. The programme will feature six new projects with communities who live in 1.5 miles of the Old Trafford stadium, a selection of North West Cultural Olympiad projects such as Greater Manchester All about Us events.
There have been a few pony trekking outings since in the Highlands. On the last occasion we came down a slope so steep that the rear of my mount was more or less sitting on the ground, and I found my feet doing the sort of bent-kneed walking that children do in pedal cars. That time the SS and K so liked one of the Highland ponies that they bought it, which raised a few logistical problems, as we were returning on the sleeper.
Pictionary- Our game only had words that started with P. (pageant, pickle, policeman etc...)
Meanwhile, I have no idea who else was in Celebration. The Interwebs describe them as a “studio band.” Not sure whether Brian played on the record, or simply appeared in the videos for promotional purposes.
This week has been crazy busy, but so good! Everyone here is busy getting ready for the chapel open house and dedication. I told you before that the branch president planned to deliver invitations to every house in Santa Cruz in Vera Cruz, right? Well...I thought it was a wonderful idea, I just didn´t realize how much work it would be! We have been delivering invitations with the elders from the other branch here in Santa Cruz and all of the youth from both branches ever since early Saturday morning...just stopping for lunch breaks at the chapel (provided by the Relief Society)....all day Saturday, Sunday and Monday. And we still have a lot of houses to visit! But I´m pretty sure that tonight we are going to finish up the rest of the invitations... I hope so anyways, because tomorrow is going to be the first night of the open house! Finally, it´s here! :D And everyone is excited!
My computer still has problems, so for the time being, I only have old-ish swatches. I have posted this colour before but I cringe at the post I made then (a million miles long and crappy photos) so I won't link it, but you can look under the Color Club label if you're interested (I hope you're not!).
Fuel Efficiency
That night she pretended to sleep when he sat down beside the bed. She did not stir when he stroked her brow. She did not blink when she felt his tears falling onto her cheeks. Did not answer when she heard him whisper, “Why? Why must you make me so angry? Why do you keep on doing these things? Like a stupid hoer meit! Don’t
In the last post (curse the bad internet fairies for not letting me post this sooner) we showed you how much fun it can be to devote a piece of your day, or perhaps a small fete a day or two before the wedding, to your small attendants. These days, the wee ones are not limited to just one flower girl and ring bearer. If you have many children in your life, and therefore your wedding, taking a bit of time to connect with them right before your moment can work wonders in letting them know how special it is to have them included. It also provides a ridiculous amount of photo op possibility. Trust me on this one!
So how does it work? The theory pretty much goes like this:
“Why of course,” said the gentleman. He offered them a seat and went off to fetch Rothmon, who came downstairs in a few minutes, adjusting his cloths as he entered the library.
Other - American Crafts Felt Thickers, Disney Embellishments, Washi Tape
Fits UK4-6 (Size XS - Size S)
Mumford and Sons put Shakespeare on a 21st century rock album with “Sigh No More.” “Oh, man is a giddy thing…”
Thank you again Lorena, you're a sweetie...
(1) Once we announce the giveaway, please allow Event Blossom two weeks to deliver your personalized gifts;
Last week I promised to share some of the material I covered at the Writers’ Institute. “Tight writing” was one of the subjects I addressed when Christine DeSmet and I presented “Why Critiquing is Necessary.”
‘Down Here in the Dark’ takes its cue from 2008′s ‘Take the Weight’ but in a more mature and polished fashion. ‘I’m so tired/Can’t open my mouth/I’m so tired/Can’t put it out. ‘ Apathy never sounded so good.
Chrysabelle meets Malkolm, an anathema vampire (a noble vamp that has been shunned) while looking for a contact her aunt has told her that might be able to help her. One thing leads to another and Chrysabelle and Malkolm find themselves in a sexual tension infused partnership to fight the evil doers in the book.
The chairmen pointed his finger towards the bothersome little Paul bot whose ratio of piss and vinegar was way in the favor of piss and advised him to “Sit down and Shut Up!”…..….the room was nothing but ‘Puss N Boots’ ooooohh kitties. Yup, the no pun intended cat was out of the bag. The republican senior discounted did want us in the room, they just wanted us to be in the room very, very quietly. Not even a one foot voice. Well Valerie would have none of it and used her big girl voice to let them know how unacceptable it was, all the while the dude in the corner (Ron Paul supporter) who happened to catch the chairmen flip his Centrum Silver on camera, was soon hovered over by the handy dandy police officer just trying to keep the peace and escorted out of the building. Then it was speech time and this round little grey haired man that had been fumbling with his belongings the entire time in the similitude of the skipper from “Gilligan’s Island” took the floor in a pacing, heartfelt tirade on how we all needed to stop fighting with one another and kum by yah all the way to facing off Obama with a limp one in the wrist, whatever that means.
Where the world has set the grooving;
John Mellencamp (then still John Cougar) is also generous with crediting Ronson with helping to make his ‘Jack & Diane’ a number one hit.
Deschutes Brewery Mirror Pond Pale Ale
Ingredients:-
In brief, the basic implications of the Objectivist concept of rights are:
The plan today is however very different and now that it covers the embedded income generated by an an innovative business making a profit, it does seem to have the real potential to encourage innovation and the exploitation of patented technology.
I know that I actually have to get to Africa, Climb the Mountain, reach the summit and get back in one piece before I take on the next chapter, but it is something worth thinking about. I’m letting my mind run away with me and really should focus on the task ahead.
The answer to 'what is your favourite beer' is fairly simple, because I'm sure we all have favourite examples of certain styles. My favourite pale ale is Goldeneye for example. Yes I know the company I work for makes it, but this is the beer that made me think 'I want to work for them'. It's a pale ale, but very different from any other. I love the uniqueness of the flavour.
4. Illustrating, collages, painting, photography, singing, dancing, nature, spending time in nature-precisely mountains, laying barefoot on the grass, being by the sea.
So as you can see some varied forces, Digby was able to run a Vlad tier list and I was able to run Hark Tier 2. This allowed me to gain +1 to my starting roll and have my upkeep spells running in turn one.
Salt Publishing are having a sale.
CL. Since the beginnings of the Sound Arts department at London College of Communication (LCC), the first course of which I developed in 1998, I began to observe the work produced by female students had significant differences from the work produced by male students. While I did not want to set up a meaningless binary – men do this/women do that – kind of thing, I was interested in taking some time to investigate whether this was in fact true and what, if anything women students both past and present thought about this in relation to their experience as sound students at LCC. In the 80s and 90s I had been involved in many initiatives to get women and girls involved in music and sound technology, yet although they theoretically had more access to equipment and training, women and girls were still generally very under-represented among sound arts students at LCC (around 10% of the total). I thought that I could use the creative work produced by women students, past and present, to challenge aesthetic perceptions of what sound arts and design at LCC is and can be, and maybe as a result attract more female applicants and widen participation.
The auction of many of the possessions from my former life took place one week ago.
Of the suppliers on the framework, around 50 per cent are small and medium businesses (SMBs), according to the government. Some of the larger suppliers taking part include Capgemini, EMC, Google, Fujitsu, HP, Microsoft, PWC, SAP, Sage and IBM.
On the message board, I discovered something amazing:
I recently had dinner with a friend who shared with me her list of 30 things to do by her 30th birthday. It had some great things like:
We were married at 2.30pm (2.30 was Robin's idea, because that's what time our show starts on a matinee day!!!) In fact , talking of 'our show', most of the cast were there, so Father David gave a little speech before the ceremony (I missed it, but found out about it later), to let everyone know that even though there were a lot of 'theatre people' in the church, this ceremony was not a show, and it was very sacred. It was lovely that he said that, I am sure it reminded everyone how important and real getting married is.
Shortlisted for the Kate Greenaway Medal, the 'Read it Again' Cambridgeshire Picture Book Award, the English 4-11 Award 2007 and the Royal Mail Scottish Children's Book awards (0-7 category) 2007.
The Prime Minister, his deputies and the ministers shall be responsible before the President of the Republic and the People’s Assembly.
In 1996, St Luke’s was taken over by the London Symphony Orchestra as a centre for its education and community work and funding was found to stabilise the building and adapt it to its new purpose.
A wall means RESTRICT stop from moving or acting freely, other words are; hamper, hinder, obstruct, block, shackle, TRAMMEL.
Maybe you experience it as anger. Maybe it’s sadness. Maybe fear or anxiety. Maybe you just feel like there’s an elephant sitting on your chest all of the time. However the pain shows up for you, that’s what we’re going to play with.
Parent’s Signature
These truths don’t even begin to scratch the surface of what Jesus suffered for you and me. His was a bitter cup, but one that He drank of willingly so that we might be saved, (Luke 22:41-42).
dressed
When I was younger I lived in Long Beach California with my parents. The weather was great, the schools had recess, and church was fun. Now I live in Houston Texas. The weather is far less than desirable most of the year, schools just have P.E. and church, well lets just say that its not the same as it was back then.
The Open Office Spreadsheet Test
Highlights included a 2 year old keg of Lambrucha (yum,
In the last 18 months I have set about reforming my practice and by the end of 2012 it will be fully complete. Then my clients will have choices in terms of how they wish to pay me for my advice including fee-for-service.
Gregory: what happens on Super Tuesday?
I also wanted to post some baby fashion ideas today as there has been a significant drop in purchases since the middle of April. This is partly due to a lack of available cash and part due to being caught up in trying to buy a new house. (For those who follow my blog, I have today been informed that the vendor has accepted another offer on my dream home as she can’t be bothered to do any more negotiating! Gutted).
The lyrics are spacey, mysterious, secretive, like some covert government agent working on your brain. It takes a little while to come to grips with Moore’s vocal style, but once you do then an enjoyable CD becomes even more enjoyable. This should go down as one of the best releases of 2003.
I love it when I’m here, but I’m better when I’m home
- Frank Miller
Pizza Cave is also one of the few Kosher restaurants in the North Jersey area that has a real, authentic Israeli-style felafel bar where you ‘stuff your own. This is just a small sampling of the salad toppings they have. I like to put Turkish Eggplant Salad, Israeli Salad, Hummus, Hot Sauce and pickles on mine.
Paperback: 208 pages
"I don't get what's going on at all," Abby said with a scowl. "Dad, you said Mum wanted to visit us here and we couldn't go there. That we left Fletching for good, unless we got into Xenith."
8. I've Had Enough
Theseus Cassio Lowood has inherited his father’s job. His duty is to rid the world of ghosts that kill humans. Note: the word “rid” Yep, you can’t “kill” a ghost, they’re already dead. And don’t even think about calling Cas something as demeaning as a Ghostbuster. The kid has killed over 20 ghosts in a few short years. Traveling across the country to perform his duty.
1 spread
Anyone who has read Diana's works before - know that they're in for a treat. To those of you who haven't had the pleasure - this is a wonderful book to start with. So simple yet full of charm, innocence and fun. I don't think I'll ever get tired of Diana's ability to weave a story in your heart and have you feeling so full of joy and amazement throughout.
suggests to me another idea: that pop is androgynising. It's a space
Top: TNT M5436
“There are even animal brothels in Germany,” she said. Sex with animals was being increasingly seen as a lifestyle choice, and thus more acceptable.
And the Yankees win the WORLD SERIES 5 to 2
When I removed all of my fears about the what-ifs of leaving it all behind, the clearest answer was to take the opportunity to travel the world and worry about the rest later. If I only had a year to live, the answer was clear- I would do whatever it took (and no, I'm not planning on dying anytime soon- it's just another method to remove fear and doubt from a decision.) I decided to stop accepting clients in New England for 2012, I would slow down on my marketing and new projects that I wouldn't be around to follow-up on, I wouldn't renew my studio lease, I would save as much money as I could, I would sell my studio furnishings, we would sell a car we weren't really using, we would pay off as much of our debt as possible, we would eat out less, and we would prepare to live out of a carry-on suitcase and a backpack for 8 months. Alex would be on sabbatical from teaching at the university and still get his salary and some research reimbursements, and I would save up in advance and try to freelance wherever I could with a visiting visa that allows me to take on work in Australia.
Karen took a lot of photographs including this one,taken from the back of the house we stayed in which is on a hill overlooking Borth y Gest.
Today I am excited to announce that I am hosting another Sketch Contest!! Woo-Hoo!
I also enjoy my visits to my family doctor. She and her nurse and receptionist are all such nice people. I look forward to those visits.
For 1972's Intensity, Charles Earland's fifth of ten Prestige discs, the Mighty Burner seemed to be aiming toward something a little different than his usual collection of soulful tenor-organ jams. The presence of two songs from the rock group Chicago and a small trumpet-dominated horn section indicate that jazz-rock was the goal. The result, the LP's four original tracks plus two tracks from the same date originally released as part of Charles III, is one of his very best.
She should have said ‘left’ at that fork!
Kevin Garnett said it best back in 2008 after the Boston Celtics won the NBA Finals, when he said “Anything is possible!”
In the most recent case, the patient was on ECMO which stands for Extra-Corporeal Membrane Oxygenation. On ECMO, the patient’s blood supply is routed out of the body via tubes inserted in the large arteries or more commonly veins in their groin to a device that oxygenates the blood before returning to the body. It’s used when a person’s lungs or heart-lung system isn’t working properly. Before ECMO was started on this patient, their supposed-to-be oxygenated arterial blood was black rather than the normal bright red. Post-ECMO insertion they were doing much better.
Source: allkpop
I must remember that God is a good God. He is a God who will leave 99 sheep to go find that 1 lost sheep. God will not forget Bennett or my cries to him on behalf of Bennett.
None of those students will be exposed to or discuss in class the literary merits of the novels written by “las Girlfriends” (Sandra Cisneros, Denise Chavez, Julia Alvarez and Ana Castillo), some of the nation’s brightest Latina literary stars, because the measure prohibits courses or classes that "are designed primarily for pupils of a particular ethnic group" and the school boards in places like Tucson believe none but Latinos would be interested in such literature.
The 3rd or Inner Eye – A metaphysical opening which refers to the 6th chakra (brow), that leads to higher consciousness. A new age symbol of enlightenment.
“You built a factory out there? Good for you,” – “Built a factory” is a summary for a lot of work. Put up equity, designed a business, took risk to buy land, get permits, pay property taxes and use taxes and permit fees. Then, bought a bunch of equipment and had it installed …and paid sales taxes. Hired some employees and paid them a bunch of money and paid payroll taxes on top of that. Bought a bunch of raw materials from companies that paid a bunch of salaries and a bunch of taxes. Building a factory is a huge private investment that pays the public a lot of taxes for the right to be built.
I’m still under the weather here. I’m reading for a bit then probably going back to sleep. Same headache is creeping back. You know you are gonna’ have a million msgs again if I don’t hear from you soon, ha ha. Hope you are well, miss talking w/you ..
Harry Potter (JK Rowling). Wanderer (Sharon Creech). Bloomability (Sharon Creech). Year of the Hangman (Gary Blackwood). The Giver (Lois Lowry). Anything by Jerry Spinelli, Patricia Polacco, and Sharon Creech.
Apparitions stand tall,
‘But tamerlane,’ you’re surely saying, ‘is it really necessary to actually kill them?’ It sure would be fun, and, one might argue, deserved. But no, all we need to do is ignore whatever they say. That’ll be hard at first, because, like the fortune tellers they are, economists lure us with vague prognostications of the tall, dark stranger we’ll meet in the next quarter with half a million new jobs, or the exotic destination we’ll visit, where housing starts are up 11%.
The old man turned to his pack mule, pulled out a double-barreled shotgun, and cocked both hammers.
Somewhere far from my default, compassion
Like the student who stayed after class every day to ask questions and talk, only to eventually share that their mother was just given months to live. And sharing in tears when we found out she passed away...
The cycles of Heaven in twenty centuries
Makes two mega scones.
The recipe I have to share with y'all today is one that has been in the works for a while and I think it's hit perfection.
City Lights Purse, Jillie Willie, *on sale for $36 if you use promo code: studio 5
About 1 teaspoon freshly squeezed lemon juice
the love songs of others
Before I show you some fierce samples, congrats to JEN! You are the winner from yesterday's comments and WIN "Princess Anya 4!" Just email Jess to claim her!
$18.95 (Canadian or US)
When we first got married it wasn't the right time, according to me. I was going back to graduate school and even though every bone in my body wanted to say fuck it, let's make a human, we waited. Luis always always wanted to at any time since the day we got together. After graduate school we moved back to Spain and we thought it would happen soon, very soon. But then I got a new job and my boss announced she was pregnant and would be needing a lot from me to help out while she was away. She was back to work a few months when she announced her pregnancy with her second child. I knew it was wrong for me to let this influence me, but it did and I worried about my employers not taking me being pregnant well. So I continued to insist that we wait while Luisito continued to want children whenever would say yes. And then the problem was that we were still in that shithole and I wanted a real home before we started a family and I didn't picture my life like this and Luisito just pictured his life with me and some kids and nothing else mattered.
Anyway, these are just my thoughts for the day. I would love to hear what you think!
much love and appreciation for your support and for commenting, and following and all that sweet stuff you do ;)
I'm going to attempt the 365 (366) days photo challenge again!
While not as extensive as a full biography of the sisters, The Brontes: A Beginner’s Guide is a great quick read packed full of great information about the Bronte sisters and their major works. It gives great themes and symbols to look for when you read their works.
How do your enemies see you?
(It will not curdle the way milk curdles when you make cottage or ricotta cheeses.)
c) Maintains national parks with public funds, preventing private sector development. Wouldn't Yellowstone be better if it were run by Disney Corp? And couldn't we sell the Smithsonian to the Chinese or something?
For me, the chapters told from Steven’s point of view worked slightly less well. I found some of his thought processes to be somewhat unrealistic for a 12 year old boy, and thought that for a child who was clearly very naive in some respects, he seemed to reason things out in a way that I would not have expected.
The US Justice Department is under intense political pressure, especially from the Republicans, to pursue Mr Assange, with leading figures of the right, such as Sarah Palin, using the leaks to attack the Obama administration.
MWGUG Blog (mwgugblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
I learned that she had a bad foot. (A tale of grossities I will not relay on the off chance that you may be eating).
Lace and doily type patterns for clothing and the home have made quite a comeback of late.
As promised, here's a little bit of my working process. This isn't everything, because I'm not including my initial thumbnail sketches or any of the work on the logo, and I'm terrible about actually documenting what I do during the painting process...but it'll have to do for now. ha-ha-ha!
There are striking parallels between obesity and cigarette smoking; we believe this comparison to be fruitful;As in, err, let's use it as a precedent. If you can read something else into that, I'd love to see into your imagination cos it probably involves unicorns, fairies and Holly Willoughby.
I’m serious! I love my glucometer.
Feed a jump ring through each drilled hole. Close the jump rings using your pliers.
William Roscoe Thayer wrote this biography in 1922, and the reason for him to do that is stated in the preface, in his own words:
Anyway, as much as I was saddened by the this whole thing, Liam loved it. He was totally in his element, playing, playing, playing all the time with a whole smorgasbord of other kids ~ older and younger ~ who were also into playing, playing, playing. Creative, dramatic play had always been his element, and other kids were happy to follow Liam's direction. And, our hands-off position regarding academics was totally respected. Nobody approached Liam about reading or math or colors or letters.
Why did we get lost on the way?
Thursday......Dan working in Morris and came home Thursday night. I took Gavin to the doctor and was told he had strep throat. He wasn't able to keep his 1st dose of prescription down. And continued to throw up all day.
some to illnesses and some completely unexpectedly.
Will this characterization be tolerated? Where are the big, powerful environmental groups on this?
The score? A pair of Selig Z chairs in very nice condition. And on top of that a bonus end table (not shown in the ad) which turned out to also be Selig. These are of course my dream lounge chairs and I never thought I'd actually own one, let alone a pair! They were super dirty but cleaned up nicely. They aren't perfect of course but close enough for me. I polished them with some Howard's Feed and Wax and they look stunning.
1 undergoing
To me you apply
Well, writing this blog entry isn’t the only thing that I shouldn’t be doing this week. There’s a hell lot of unplanned and not-supposed-to-do-or-else-you’ll-fail-your-summer-classes things that I’ve done.
Now that is officially July, I want to remind you about a few special event this month:
The arch is 47.8m in length with a height of 22.1m, while each tower has an average height of 24m. There are spiral stairs within each tower which leads to the top of the tower but the access point had been securely locked by the authority concern. It would have been a breathtaking view from the top of the tower.
* Use ruffles (e.g. fabric ruffles, make paper ruffles, ruffled ribbon, etc.).
I'll walk beside you until the end of time,
Never been impressed with Widmer. Bought this as a single a while back and have been avoiding it in favor of others, but I figure, what the hell.
Thank you to all who have stuck with me!
How, when the aged are reverently, passionately waiting
I would have liked the biscuits a bit thinner and a bit crunchier but the are close to what I remember Kingston biscuits tasting like, but it has been a long time since I've had one.
Florida, of rivers long dried revealing
God spoke to me with a metaphor that just kept building as I looked into the word and my journey. I will try to explain in the best way possible.
Use Trip Advisor ratings (one of the best I think) and similar sites as a guide not as a given. It is not always clear whether every rating is genuine and while I hope they are, it is important to read them with an open mind. I have read scathing reviews of hotels that I love and vice-versa... These sites are not definitive guides but they can offer some insights... and they can also mis-inform... (Like the time I arrived in Budapest for a weekend only to be staying 30 kilometres from the centre of the town... my fault entirely because I was naive enough to trust an unknown site without double checking and because I didn't do my research properly...)
“The Haida trembled and vibrates as the turbines throb. Petty Officer HP Murray and Telegraphist SA Turner are still on one of the scramble nets trying to rescue survivors as the ship starts to move. They look at the hands reaching out to them and grab for one more. The ocean current around their legs gets stronger and, handing off the last of the survivors, they both struggle to unhook themselves from the nets. The waves are now waist high, and the force is making it impossible to climb up. Hands from above reacdch down, gripping … pulling … tugging, but it is no use. The Haida picks up speed and suddenly the rope breaks. The wake surges over the two men and washed them straight into the turning screws.”
16:30 Security received a report to call for a plumber to room A13 at the Clinical Science Building at the City Hospital due to a slow drip from a pipe. A bucket was placed underneath the leak. Helpdesk informed.
Greys: IG2, IG1
Il quitte sa monture, s'étend à terre.
Rusty is a mess of his own making, a typical playboy jock in a lot of ways. A little too dependent on the bottle, and crude and very rough around the edges, Rusty is as intriguing as he is frustrating. With a knack for cutting someone straight to the bone, and seemingly able to do it without emotion, Rusty will twist reader’s emotions right alongside Honor’s. Still, the underlying personality and intricacies of this character come out little by little, showing the boy he really is, and giving plenty of insight into who he was even before Finn enlisted. With a growing new camaraderie with Honor, and his own way of dealing with losing his best friend, Rusty’s character will stand out as much as Honor’s does.
I’ve exhausted my RAM, forgotten to defragment my life, and blown up my hard drive. All available disk space is being used. I’m spent. I’m dry. I’m done. Not only have I failed to back up my files, I’ve forgotten to plug in. My battery is so dead it’s like a black hole devouring all the energy trying to pour in.
I will now make a controversial statement that most men will find ludicrous to the point of absurdity: there are more interesting things on a woman than her breasts. I’m thinking particularly of her nose. Smalls ones are supposed to be cute and feminine, yet long pointy ones are far more intriguing. Miss Aniston should reflect on the fact that Meryl Streep has never once exposed her bust in a movie. People are too interested in her face to wonder what her jahoobies look like.
They called me last night at 9 pm to tell me they took him by ambulance to the emergency room.
Sonshine soldiered on through his slice bravely and then gave up as he reached 'the crust' as he put it.
Humility is the quiet vale, fertile and abounding in life, where peace dwells.
The data set surprised me a little as out of 817 connections, 48 where “accumulators” at 500+ or in other words 6% of my connections where outliers. This large of a number surprised me as my thinking was it was going to be only around 3%. So with the data in Excel it was off to the races with the analysis portion of the experiment and the first was to run the “mean” function to provide a simple average of 147 (it was 168 with the outliers) while the “median” was 120 (it was 128 with the outliers) all well within Dunbar’s suggested range set. Also not to start folk’s eyes glazing over, so will keep it short however also ran the kurtosis as well as several other tests on the data set validating the perceptions of the results which all checked out.
You’re journey to success as a leader is not and “island” vacation expereince. You cannot realize true success without the help, influence, and/or resources of other people, so please stop behaving as though you can. When you do, you devalue the institution of leadership.
All said and done, it was a wonderful day. I was so happy to be there as a family and to have all the people who love Oldest be there to support him (besides Jack who stayed home with a super neighbor).
Suggestions, just that I can think of off the top of my head, and please know that you’re entirely not limited just to the items in this list:
However the cost of being named after him in a traditional and conservative society is definitely high. To some degree, the party’s ideology has succeeded in co-existing with the Islamic values of the North-Sudanese society. Nevertheless, some sort of hostility still exists. It could take the form of jokes, sarcasm or even loathing. The jokes usually come from those who are close to you. Like someone, for example, chanting your name in a rhyme; Abdulkhalig adu alkhalig (Abdulkhalig the enemy of God)! Or when you swear by God to someone to confirm that you will tell the truth. He will immediately say; but you don’t even know the God, let alone believe in Him. The religious ones, mostly, show their pettiness by saying you are an ‘infidel’ and you have been misled by anti-Islam propaganda.
@ Betti Ono (www.bettiono.com)
My husband brought the mail home with him this evening (our mail comes to the base) and there were boxes and envelopes overflowing with the many lingerie sewing accoutrements I've been snapping up lately, my much awaited garter clips included!
The End of Everything is a book about sisters, fathers and daughters, family and friendships, truths dripping reluctantly from the owner, but more than that, it’s a book about two young girls on the verge of discovering the confusing and heady power of their gender.
I already have an F. I’m already going to have to re-take this class. Why should I show up?
ABC: The National Post was the first newspaper in Canada to issue a Consolidated Media Report. What drove you to be an early adopter?
Frenchy: “Yoo should go get some water. Yoo kent risk not haffing enuf.”
The mythology of Callisto is a similar story when connected to Jupiter/Zeus. It begins with jealousy, betrayal, illegitimacy, almost matricide and ending with magic and revenge...ahhh a day with the Zeus family! Not one to use heart shapes in my work I surprised myself when I found this old mylar heart in my collage box. It seemed to be perfect and I got past my resistance and added it to the mix....a possible heart totem. Also added wood stain to unify the colors?!
Phil “Philthy Animal” Taylor on drums and Eddie Clark on
Sure, we still love the soapy daftness, and the occasional jaw-dropping moment of genuine wonder, served up by Britain’s Got Talent andThe X Factor. Heaven knows, we wouldn’t want to lose those shows. It’s just that we’re wise enough now to understand how they work. We’ve cottoned on to their game, figured out the elements that are staged and faked, got wise to the way they manipulate us. We’re not daft.
and no one knows
“This usually leads to a double peak in the sunspot number and CME rate as a function of time,” Nat Gopalswamy, a solar scientist NASA’s Goddard Space Flight Center in Greenbelt, Md., in an email to TPM.
**But he loves me so much too. He constantly tells us that he loves us and is the kissing-est little thing. He and Lance are truly best friends right now but he will not admit to that in front of me. He says, "We're all best friends. We're a familwy."
Hoping to follow on this success, Percival Lowell hoped to do something similar some 80 years later. Having then detected subtle perturbations in the orbit of Neptune, he funded the search for "planet X", a large planet even further out. Initial observations were less than successful...planet X's position had to be recalculated 3 times after initial searches turned up nothing. But, in 1930, Clyde Tombaugh observing at Lowell Observatory discovered a tiny light moving night-to-night. 40 AU out...this was it! Planet Pluto! Once again, astronomers congratulated themselves on their sheer brilliance, and their fancy scientific method.
i want to free myself from the pangs of anxiety that throttles me... and i want to be free from knowing that i am not growing.
One thing that really ticks me off about snarky, self-consciously hip flicks—and Todd Phillips’ Road Trip immediately comes to mind, but I’m sure there are others (mumblecore, I don’t trust you!)—is that they make a character an obvious and devout Christian for no other reason but to mock that person further, so stupid “crazy” things come out of the character’s mouth. It’s a cheap shot, and usually done without a point. The dickhead R.A. at the dorm from Road Trip doesn’t need to be a Xian just for more cheap shots.
I'm teaching my parents a lesson. I do plan on getting back in touch, but not until they've had a long time to realize that they need us more than we need them. It's heartbreaking and it's not an easy choice to make. So much baggage goes along with it. People understand divorce more than they do cutting ties with parents. Many people also shared how they have felt so alone going through this process. Some have people making them feel guilty about their decisions. All this made me wonder: If this is taboo, why is that? Why do we give people a hard time about cutting ties with parents? Do we as a society feel that a person owes her parents something, no matter how badly they have treated her? If this is such a common issue, why aren't we talking about it more?
SENDAK
Forever my life is yours
Jamaal Magloire – (Nike) Hyperfuse – size 18
Put the milk, yeast, egg and 1 cup of the flour in the bowl of a heavy-duty mixer. Mix the ingredients together with a rubber spatula, mixing just until everything is blended. Sprinkle over the remaining cup of flour to cover the sponge.
There have been dozens of instances of New York remade for the escape-hatch sub-realities of gaming in studios around the world. In just the past decade we could name Alone In The Dark, True Crime, The Hulk, World In Conflict, Forza 2, Project Gotham, 50 Cent, Max Payne 1 & 2, Gran Turismo 3, and Def Jam Vendetta. This number spills into scores more across the previous decades, and it's a figure which becomes hazier still when mods, expansions, analogues, and cancelled or lost projects are counted in the mix.
According to legend, on 21st April 753 B.C. Romulus, who was then to become the first King of Rome, drew the 'sacred furrow' on the Palatine hill, which was the first step towards the founding of the Eternal City. The anniversary came into vogue with the Risorgimento. Then it became a national holiday with fascism and was abolished in 1945. The celebration was renewed in 1994 with all its ceremonies. This weekend Rome will hold several festivals, concerts, and special events this weekend. Historical societies put on gladiator displays and performances in and around the forum area. There's usually a spectacular fireworks display by the Tiber River.
How can you tell if a lawyer is telling a lie? His lips are moving....
so, what to do?
In a previous post I discussed how fat is sticky and muscle is reactive. How all things don’t change at the same rate and that it’s a lot of hard work if you want to get rid of your icing.
Another tag team match was about to get started. This would be the second to the last match of the night. Santino and Ryder vs. Primo and Epico. Like any typical MNR tag team match, this one was no different. A few decent spots by Primo and Epico, but Santino and Ryder would predictably pick up the win.
How neat is that! And YES, I am hereby giving you permission to go buy and consume lotsa chocolate and candy. It's for a good cause! And you only have until November 14th to do it, so get on it already!
Cloud and the roadside bushes brimming with whistling
Stephanie Plum and her wacky family years ago; I have totally fallen in love with each and every member of this Trenton group. I tend to bond most with Lula, but that's a given with her taste in clothes, style and food. I was delighted to learn that a movie had finally been made about this zany group, although I was a bit of a concern about Katherine Heigl being in the
He then handed me my passport back and told me to HAVE A GOOD DAY.
And then there were the events themselves. There was the men's 800 meters with Andrew Wheating (1:46.21) fighting to the last step against Texas' Tevan Everett (1:46.27) to try and secure the final available points for his Oregon squad. Or how about the battle down the straight between Porscha Lucas, 22.81 (Texas A&M), Charonda Williams, 22.84 (Ariz St) and Alexandria Anderson, 22.88(Texas) Lucas looking to secure points towards their championship bid. Or the men's 110 hurdles where the University of Florida had two entrants that didn't win but scored significant points in 3rd (William Wynne) and 7th (Kallinka Pitt) pushing them into title contention heading into the meet's final event - the 4x4 relay.
Both Reisinger and O’Grady seem to feel very entitled, and both seem to have no clue how Apple works.
Clay Pipe Brewing Company Hop-Ocalypse
Lastly, these things showed that, we, as a redeemed by the blood of Jesus Christ, we are to bring heaven here on earth, even in the 7 spheres/ mountains of societies and bring the Kingdom of God as an Ambassador of Christ, making earth like heaven.
One of the things that might be said about the safest parts of these United States is that the safest areas, I would venture, are areas where more citizens own guns. Liberal areas, which usually include the large cities and their immediate suburbs, are usually areas with fewer legal guns and more illegal ones in the possession of criminal or criminally-prone people.
It still is.
3/06/2012 Springfield, MO – Outland Ballroom
Pop Up Pianos
And wait for your hearts to stop beating.
No Compulsion in Deen
14. Yobosayo (Moonbase)
David Karaffa and his wife, Katie.
We cannot escape! More on this later…go live your life!
Peanut Butter Pie...not sure where I got this recipe from YEARS ago, but it is like the signature pie served at Little Joe's Restaurant in Oneonta, AL in the early 60's.
If perhaps you are wondering regarding the right place to purchase the electric moped, then simply tour the web immediately. Right now there are many online businesses on web which will offer high quality services to the people at attractive prices. One and only thing you should do is research well before purchasing to get the finest deals. These kinds of scooters are intelligently developed according to the requirements of the people.These scooters are compact, comfortable and easy to handle. They will offer immense flexibility to reduce the pressure on your body while driving. This easy handling has got contributed to the improved safety and security of these vehicles on the street. A lot of these vehicles can easily also offer you great returns on your financial investment in the long term. The low consumption of gasoline and very simple maintenance helps make them a very economical choice. Therefore if you want to enjoy a non problematic ride, then simply search a reliable online site and take benefits of the scooter.
Ventilation Monitoring in the Critically Ill Patient- Describe capnography, definition and physiology. Discuss normal EtCO2 readings and common conditions causing altered values, describing the differences between EtCO2 and PaCO2 with an explanation of ventilation perfusion matching. Discuss the different capnography technologies. Discuss capnography monitoring in different hospital environments. Describe normal and abnormal waveforms. 1.5 Free CEUs for Nurses
log
I will have more time to blog, I am on vacation, school is over until september. Woooot !
One of the things that you often hear from those who encounter home emergencies is that they wish they would have been more prepared. Although there’s nothing we can do to totally prevent these weather disasters or accidents in the home, we can try to be one step ahead so that we can be prepared when the time comes.
For those of you not so lucky as to be at CHA, don't worry. We've got the stamp images and some gorgeous samples from our fantabulous design team right here for your visual delight.
I'd been wondering where the Harris's sparrows were. They always arrive later than the other birds, like a mid-winter present. I saw the first few on Tuesday, sporting their characteristic black beret and bib. So far, nine of them have showed up.
Like most horror movies, Dawn of the Dead is simplicity itself. It picks up essentially where the first film left off. The dead are still coming back to life, but society hasn’t broken down completely yet. Still, the signs are there that soon enough the world will be in chaos, and it will be every person for him- or herself. Into this walk Francine (Gaylen Ross), who works at a television station. She and her boyfriend Stephen (David Emge) plan to escape that night in the helicopter he uses as a traffic reporter. Meanwhile, we also meet Roger (Scott H. Reiniger) and Peter (Ken Foree), two SWAT cops who have had experience with battling the ghouls. Roger mentions the plan of his friend Stephen and invites Peter along. The four fly off and find a shopping mall with a small collection of undead in it. They decide to stay and fortify the mall, since it contains essentially everything they need to survive in style for some time.
“Medic 6 en route.”
How important is music in your life?
Sometimes it is suggested that the rantings of Murdoch properties makes comparatively less extreme Right-wing bias more presentable and thus making it sound reasonable. But I don’t think that is the case, either; such bias on its own is not necessarily persuasive. Propaganda is ineffective if it is recognized as propaganda; getting significant numbers of a society to support policies not in their interests has to be accomplished in diffuse and subtle ways.
Joanna Fontaine-Crawford
Chapter 50
Round 5: Ch 3. *2 dc in next dc, dc in next 3 dc, repeat from * around. Join to top ch of ch 3. (50 dc)
$50 per place setting or $450 for a table that seats 10. 1220 Arden Hills Lane. 530-672-6761
He looks like a boy on a mission :-)
If you would like to take part (and it sounds like a good deal to me), contact me below and I will send further details. Send me a link to your folksy or etsy shop if you would prefer me to contact you that way.
Mix 1 teaspoon of dry yeast and 2 table spoons of sugar in warm water (leave it for 15 minutes)
Tape decks have a use again!
Happiest of Aprils to All!
But one thing never fails to deliver little bites of pleasure. It is the endless stream of brazen lies from the internet hucksters. For example, an email from the Land of Useless Exclamation Marks saying "drayton, as promised here is your Video Secrets Revealed Download!" They say "Professional video is a must when trying to create your own Brand!"
On top of that, we had to rush the dog to the vets on Monday. Noticed her licking her butt. On closer examination, there an extra hole back there. After an afternoon at the vets. She had to be sedated in order for them to examine it. We took her home drowsie on morphine. What a sad looking girl she was. We got her home and she wobbled her way downstairs rather quickly to her crate, and crashed. Well what a treat trying to put the cone on her. She wanted nothing to do with that. I'd put it on, she'd claw it off. This went on several times. I finally decided it was too big and cut it down. Well I cut too much off. So back to the vets this morning to buy another. This time I measured to make sure. She's having a hard time navigating the house, the cone ketches on doorways and walls, stopping her up fast. Hopefully she'll heal fast. By the way, she has a ruptured anal gland.
Ooo I wanna take you down to Kokomo
That was the beginning and I never looked at buying a pair of cons new again.
institution.
When I was small my teachers used to put topper’s first and all other students were worthless in their eyes, it was likely that most of us developed a low self-esteem because of this. We felt that we were not as good as them because teachers disliked us and mocked us often. It was hurtful and destructive for a child’s growth. I started believing that I was not good enough because I could not keep my teachers happy and same applied to parents..I developed this pattern of crying over negative happening’s and rejoicing over positive happening’s.
What we do know, however, is that Keenan’s lawsuits are a critical part of this plan.
8. Bringin' Down Dinner – 3:16
